Huey: (narrating) I am not a prophet, but sometimes I have prophetic dreams, 
like the one where I was at a garden party.
Huey: Excuse me. Everyone, I have a brief announcement to make. Jesus was 
black, Ronald Reagan was the Devil, and the government is lying about 9/11. 
Thank you for your time and good night.
(The people suddenly erupt into a riot. Huey wakes up, and is immediately 
smacked by Granddad.)
Granddad: Mmm-hmm! You were havin' that dream where you made the white people 
riot, weren't you?
Huey: But I was telling the truth!
Granddad: How many times have I told you, you better not even dream about 
tellin' white folk the truth! You understand me? (walks away) Shoot! Makin' 
White people riot! You better learn how to lie like me! I'm gonna find me a 
white man and lie to him right now!
%
Granddad: (wearing bath towel around his waist, holding empty orange juice 
carton) Would one of y'all like to explain this?!
Riley: (rubs his eyes, groans)Mmmm, you mean the orange juice or the mini-skirt?
%
Granddad: Y'all need to start appreciating your granddaddy. I went and spent 
your inheritance on this beautiful house in this neighborhood and all I ask you 
to do is act like you got some class!
Riley: (to Huey) Hey...what's "class"?
Huey: It means, "don't act like niggas."
Granddad: S-s-s-see? That's what I'm talkin' about right there! We don't use 
the "n-word" in this house!
Huey: Granddad, you said the word "nigga" 46 times yesterday. I counted!
Granddad: Nigga, hush!
%
Granddad: There's a new White man out there! He's refined! For example, did you 
know the new white man loves gourmet cheese?
Huey: [disbelieving] I-I'm sorry...did you say cheese?
Granddad: That's right; cheese. You give the meanest White man a piece of 
cheese and he'll turn into Mister Rogers.
Huey: Granddad, that doesn't make any sense.
Granddad: Don't you talk back to me, boy!
Huey: Granddad, you can't tame the White Supremacist power structure with 
cheese!
Granddad: Oh yes I can.
Huey: No you can't!
Granddad: YES I CAN!
Huey: No, you CAN NOT!
%
Ed Wuncler: What's your position on Gay Marriage?
Granddad: Well, first of all, I believe all marriage is wrong!
%
Riley: I know about white people. Like when [white people] talk they say the 
whooole woorrd likeee thisss.
%
Robert: Huey!
(The scene turns to the living room where Riley and Huey sit on the sofa while 
Robert stands in front of them holding Riley's BB gun.)
Robert: This damn thing looks real.
Riley: Can I have my gun back!?
(Robert accidentally shoots the gun at the table where the pellet ricochets off 
the surface and strikes Riley in the leg.)
Riley: Aaaaoohhhww! Son of a gah, gih, gah!
%
Granddad: (To Huey) The hell I can't! You're gonna go and you're not gonna 
embarrass me in front of my new neighbors or I'm gonna beat your ass.
Riley: Why can't we act like ourselves, huh? Why can't I be me? Are you ashamed 
of us or something?
Granddad: Very!
%
(In a flashback, a young Robert Freeman arrives late to a civil rights 
demonstration wearing a raincoat and hat.)
Robert: Aw man, I missed it! Was it bad? Did they do the thing with the fire 
hoses?
Protester: (angry and completely soaked) What do you think, chump?
Robert: Damn, what's eating you?
Protester: A God-damn German Shepherd. That's what's eating me! Where was you?
Robert: I-I had to go back to the apartment because I forgot my raincoat!
Protester: You went to-- you--this nigga went to get a mother(Beep)' raincoat!
Woman Protester: I can't believe you!
Robert: We've all been watching the same news! The police been doing this fire 
hose thing all week! I just assumed we'd all wear our raincoats.
Protester: Damn it, Robert! Who the hell shows up to a march with a raincoat?
Robert: Bet you wish you had your raincoat now!
Protester #2: YOU SON OF A BITCH!!!
Robert: Remember what Dr. King says!
(The other protesters attack Robert)
%
(The Freemans have just arrived at the Wuncler Estate, where Uncle Ruckus is 
working as a valet)
Uncle Ruckus: (Rudely shouldering past Granddad) Outta the way, Kunta Kinte! 
(Warmly, to the white guest who pulled up behind the Freemans) Yes, sir. How 
can I help you?
Grandad: (indignantly) Excuse me?
(Uncle Ruckus looks at the Freemans)
Uncle Ruckus: Aw, Lord have mercy. (into his walkie-talkie) Security! Security! 
We have us a Code Black! A Code Black at the main gate!
Voice over the walkie-talkie: Ruckus, what the hell is a 'Code Black?'
Uncle Ruckus: (candidly) There's some hungry-lookin' niggas out at the front 
gate.
(Huey looks offended)
%
Grandad: (To Wuncler III) Uh, so I understand you just got back from Iraq?
Riley: For real? Yo, what's it like?
Wuncler III: What's it like?! What am I supposed to say to that? It was cool, 
there was bitches. Okay they was bitches but a lot of them had, ya know, they 
was cova'ed up in them curtains and stuff they be wearin'. But, I digress. It 
was WAR. It was war, basically. War, you know what that's like? Mother(Beeped) 
be like shooting (imitating a machine gun) Gah-geh-ga-ga-ge-gu-ga-gow! Bombs 
blowin' up. An' ya know, the shit scared me. It scared the shit outta me. 
Matter o' fact, I shit on myself over a dozen times. And ran out of toilet 
paper after the second time. So you know what that meant, right? I had to use 
the thumb, man, it was kinda nasty. But ya know, the good thing about it was 
they stopped taking me out on patrol cause my name became "Stink Bomb," you 
know wha' I'm saying? They said I was giving away our position, because of the 
shit smell. That was fine with me, know wha' I'm saying? They wanted to leave 
me back? And I was like, "Well (Beep) y'all. Y'all go ahead long, cause I don't 
need y'all anyway. I'm rich, bitch." (notices everyone is staring blankly at 
him) The fuck y'all looking at?
%
Riley: (entering Ed's room and seeing his huge array of guns) Woah... are 
they... real?
Ed Wuncler III: Real? Put it dis' way, if I picked one up and, put it to yo 
face, pull de' trigger... will you be dead?
%
Riley: (Raises and aims a shotgun.) Are you sure that vest will stop this 
shotgun?
(Camera turns to Wuncler III who is wearing a bullet-proof vest.)
Wuncler III: Man I'm like de' terminator in dis' vest. (Drains an entire bottle 
of beer in one swig then belches loudly.) What, chu' don't believe me? Go 
ahead! Pull the trigger.
Riley: Now are you sure that-
Wuncler III: I said pull that trigger NOW!
Riley: You wanna play rough? Okay.
(Uncle Ruckus outside singing his song, 'Don't trust them new niggas over 
there'. Rich people clap after song while Riley tries to tell Robert off.)
Riley: Say hello to my little friend! (Pulls the trigger of the gun and is 
thrown against the door of the room due to the force of the blast.) Ungh!
Wuncler III: (Goes flying out the window.)Waaaaaaaaaahhhhhh! (Lands on the 
ground outside where the party is being held. All the rich people stand up to 
look at him and he sits up to look at them.) (Beep) ya'll lookin' at?
%
Priest: Well you should definitely see the passion. It's a very important movie.
Huey: Couldn't see it, white Jesus.
Priest: Excuse me?
Huey: Come on man, It's supposed to be all historically accurate, and they 
STILL have a white man playing Jesus? That's some old bullshit.
%
Uncle Ruckus: (singing badly) Don't trust them new niggers over there! Leavin' 
their nigger essence in the air! Them happy, nappy-head niggers, with their 
fingers on the trigger! Don't trust them new niggers over there! Don't trust 
them big nostrils over yonder! They suck up so much air, it'll make you wonder! 
Don't trust them new niggers, with they spiny little nigger fingers! Don't 
trust them new niggers over there!
%
Riley: (Walks up to Huey with his arm in a cast.) Ay, you think we in trouble?
Huey:You shot his grandson out the window, what chu' think? Shhh. I dunno, I 
didn't wanna move here but, I don't want grandad to lose his house. He worked 
his whole life to get here.
Riley: Man, I liked that house. Oh well, I shot a nigga'!(Starts laughing)
%
Ed Wuncler: In 30 years, that boy's going to become the President of the United 
States... and he'll still be a (Beeped) idiot.
%
Granddad: What's wrong with a man giving away a golden shower? Sounds like a 
nice gift to me.
[Riley laughs]
Granddad: What? Shoot, I wish somebody gave me a golden shower. (Riley laughs) 
One, I like gold. Two, I like showers. (Riley laughs hysterically) Put it 
together, hey, that sound like the life, hyoo...
Riley: (recovering) If you're good, Santa Claus might give you a golden shower 
for Christmas. (he laughs)
Granddad:Christmas? My man, Santa.
%
Riley: Granddad, can you take us into the city tomorrow to watch the R. Kelly 
trial?
Granddad: Hell, no. But you can walk.
Riley: It's forty miles!
Granddad: All the money I spent on them damn Nikes? You better just do it.
%
Riley: She saw piss comin', she stayed.
Tom: Yes, she did, but--
Riley: And why should I have to miss out on the next R. Kelly album JUST fo' 
that? (walks away)
Huey: (to Tom) Man, you just got beat by an eight-year-old.
%
Young Uncle Ruckus: Hang that nigga now! I got the rope right here! (he holds 
up a noose)
%
R. Kelly's Lawyer: (making an opening statement) The ancient Greeks, the 
architects of western civilization, would regularly indulge in sexual 
activities with children. Were they perverts? In Puritan America, the 
forefathers of this great land would take wives who were 12 or 13 years old, 
much younger than the alleged victim. Were they sickos? In Tokyo, you could buy 
teenage girls' panties in vending machines. Do we call them disgusting? Of 
course not! What do all those things have to do with Robert Kelly? Nothing. 
Let's get to the point. Now some people see this so-called mountain of evidence 
— these video tapes, photographs, eyewitnesses, and DNA — and see a guilty 
man, but some of us can see that mountain of so-called evidence for what it 
really is: racism.
%
Robert: Didn't Jerry Lee Lewis marry a thirteen-year-old baby?
Uncle Ruckus: You can't compare a chocolate monkey like R. Kelly to Jerry Lee 
Lewis! He was the king of rock n' roll. Great balls of fire! And besides, that 
was different. It was family
%
Uncle Ruckus: Now I know exactly what happened to Kobe. Kobe caught that white 
fever. White fever get in your blood, man, it'll make you crazy. And you know 
they got them short little skirts nowadays and that uhh... What they call them, 
the the the tongs?
Robert: Thongs.
Uncle Ruckus: Yeah, right, they got the thongs all up the booty crack and they 
got that sweet white nectar. (he closes his eyes) Oh, Lord have mercy. (he 
starts sweating) And after that it's over. You wake up and you don't even know 
what you done done. Just a pool of sweat around your ankles and a deep sense of 
satisfaction. (he starts to wipe the sweat from his brow) Give me a minute, 
Robert.
Robert: You look like you need to take five.
%
Huey: Here's something black people have known for a couple of hundred years: 
niggas are crazy. Now black people don't like to talk about crazy niggas in 
public 'cause white people might be listening.
%
Robert: Hey, you know what Kobe said to OJ after the trial? "I hope this 
doesn't put you off white women"
Uncle Ruckus: That's funny on so many levels
%
Huey: [Voiceover] I did battle with ignorance today, and ignorance won. I admit 
that I'm often... vexed at the behavior of my own people. Yeah... "vexed" is a 
good word. You do what you can to help black folks, and they make you wonder 
why you even bother. But they're our people, and we gotta love 'em regardless. 
One thing for sure, though: can't blame this one on the white man.... what am I 
sayin'? 'Course I can!
%
Granddad: I just can't stand to see a child go unbeaten.
%
Cristal: Hey, boys! (she bends down to shake Huey's hand)
Huey: Yeah...uh...I'd rather not.
Cristal: My name's Cristal, like the champagne.
Huey : Well, that sounds like a stripper name. Cristal like the champagne, 
might you be a stripper?
Cristal: And just what do you know about strippers, little man?
Huey: Not much, but I do know they're usually named after liquor. (Riley 
snickers at the joke)
%
Riley: You do realize that light-skinned ho was a ho, right Granddad?
Granddad: Don't cuss, boy, now watch your mouth.
Riley: I didn't cuss; I said "ho."
Granddad: Riley, don't think because I'm driving I can't come back there.
Riley: I don't see what the big deal is. Just sayin' ho.
(Granddad reaches behind back seat of car and proceeds to repeatedly strike 
Riley.)
Granddad: (while striking Riley) You need to watch your filthy mouth!
Huey: Granddad stop! (grabs the wheel) Granddad, Riley! Stop! Or we are going 
to die!
(Granddad takes the wheel again and barely misses getting hit by an 18-wheeler)
Granddad: Now, I bet you won't say it again.
Riley: (after a pause and rubbing his cheek) Ho.
(Granddad again strikes Riley, his car swerving all over the road.)
Granddad: I got your ho right here!
Huey: Watch the road! Watch the road, Granddad!
%
Huey: Granddad, have you asked yourself why a twenty-year-old girl would want 
to go out with a man your age?
Granddad: Because I laid my game down quite flat.
Riley: Game? What you know about the game Granddad?
Granddad: I know the game.
Riley: Takin' women out to eat? Givin' 'em free meals? What part of the game is 
that? You takin' her to Red Lobster with the cheddar biscuits. The fam ain't 
eatin' cheddar biscuits, but this random broad is eatin' cheddar biscuits.
Granddad: (turns away from the mirror) I know the game. Your grandaddy knows 
the game.
Riley: Game recognize game, Granddad.
Granddad: (gets in Riley's face) I recognize game. Your granddaddy recognize 
game.
Riley: Game recognize game, and you lookin' kinda unfamiliar right now. I... I 
can't... where's Granddad? Can I help you sir?
Granddad: (stares at Riley for a while) I ain't got time to mess around with 
y'all. I gotta date. Get out the way. (he walks off screen)
Riley: (follows him off screen) Don't do it Granddad! Don't feed her!
Granddad: (O.S.) Come on, now, stop. Get off my leg.
Riley: (weeping O.S.) Don't feed her the cheddar biscuits! Noooo!
Granddad: (O.S.) Don't try to hold me back. What the hell? Get off me, boy. 
What's wrong with you?
%
[Granddad has taken Cristal out to dinner at Red Lobster; she has eaten several 
plates of food]
Cristal: These cheddar biscuits are so good! They just melt in your mouth! 
Thank you for the meal, it was very romantic. Like tasting the sea or somethin'.
Granddad: Wow, I have never seen a woman eat like that. Or a man actually.
Cristal: You should bring some home for the boys.
Granddad: I don't know, if you feed them they'll never leave.
Cristal: Stop. They're so cute! You must love having them around.
Granddad: Not really.
Cristal: [Reaches and grabs Granddad's hand] You should let me babysit 
sometimes.
Waiter: Doggy bag?
Cristal: A doggy bag is ninety bucks. A tea bag is fifty. But I have to ask you 
to excuse me right now. See, I'm kinda, you know, on a real date.
%
Huey: Riley... All women are not hoes. We're talkin' twenty... twenty-five 
percent tops.
Riley: Okay. But if they not all hoes, then why I got to pay to take 'em out to 
eat, then? I mean, I'm payin'. That's payment!
Huey: I... I don't know. 'Cause that's just what you do. You meet a girl, you 
take her out to dinner, but... you're not paying the girl. You're paying the 
restaurant.
Riley: But I'm payin'. Which makes her a ho. Why don't I just give her the 
money I was gonna spend on dinner, and that ho can go grocery shopping?
Huey: (befuddled)
%
(later)
Riley: (continuing) That's how it starts, you know? Takin' bitches out to eat 
— meals and whatnot. Next thing you know, you wake up in a rest haven for 
hoes. A sanctuary for scandalous skeezes and stunts.
Huey: You're jumpin' to conclusions. It's just a date.
Riley: What if he marries her? What if we end up with a ho for a grandma?
Huey: Riley, shut your dumb ass up.
Riley: What if we have a ho for a grandma, and she comes to school on career 
day? Ooh... what if they have kids? We'd have a brother or sister that's half 
ho!
Huey: Riley!
%
Cristal: (playing PS2 with Riley) What's up now?
Riley: Why you keep doin' the same move?
Cristal: Where yo game at? Where yo game at?
Riley: My 'X' button ain't workin.
Cristal: Whatever, nigga.
Riley: Hey, look! I'm pressin' it! You SEE me pressin' it! You cheat!
Cristal: Bitch, your game is garbage. (she jumps up in the air) I'm Cristal, 
bitch! Who's next?
Riley: Fake ass Mariah Carey! (he throws the controller and runs away crying)
Cristal: That's how nasty my game is, son. (to Huey) I send niggas runnin' away.
Huey: (stares at her)
Cristal: What?
%
Huey: Granddad, that woman has got to go.
Granddad: Miss Cristal is my beautiful baby boo, and you will show her some 
respect.
Huey: Granddad, we don't know anything about Ms. Cristal. I mean, we know she 
spends all your money, we know she eats more than a black hole...
Riley: WE KNOW SHE CHEAT AT PLAYSTATION!
Huey: But where does she live? What does she do for a living?
Granddad: She's in sales.
Riley: Pff... Ho sales...
Granddad: What?!
%
Huey: Okay, Cristal. We need to have a talk.
Cristal: Before you start, I just want to say how much fun it's been hanging 
out with you guys. Think of me as a big sister you always wanted.
Huey: Don't take this the wrong way, but... I need you get the hell up out of 
here.
Cristal: Any particular reason?
Huey: You're kind of a lazy ho?
Cristal: Yeah, I can see that.
Huey: I don't know why my granddad can't see.
Cristal: To be honest, me either. It's so obvious. But it's okay, because I'm 
in a transitional period...
Huey: [interrupting] Ah-ah-ah! I don't care. You gotta go.
Cristal: [takes out a cigarette and lights it] I can't do that.
Huey: I'm sorry?
Cristal: You guys have the life. And I want to have the life, too.
Huey: Yeah, but it's our life. We're his family.
Cristal: Oh, so now we get to what this is really about! I'm not one of y'all, 
I'm not in the family, I don't carry his genes... so, I have to go?
Huey: Uh, yeah. Plus, you're a lazy ho.
Cristal: "Ho" is a strong term. Right now, I'm somewhere between "anatomical 
sales associate" and "high maintenance girlfriend." Can't you be positive about 
my growth?
Huey: Cristal, every part of you bein' here is unacceptable. Do you realize I'm 
doing prostitute laundry? Do you have any idea how disgusting that is?!
Cristal: [puts out cigarette] Look, this is an adjustment for everyone. But 
it's what your grandfather wants. You can't get rid of me. I can do things to 
persuade your granddad that you can't do.
Huey: Like what? [thinks for a second] Never mind, I don't want to know.
%
Riley: (answering doorbell) It's a nigga in a purple suit!
(Cristal hides as Robert walks to the door)
Robert: Who are you?
A Pimp Named Slickback: My name is A Pimp Named Slickback, and I believe I may 
have misplaced some merchandise at this residence. There she is. (to Cristal) 
Bitch I hope you got the moneys to cover this little vacation you've been 
takin'.
Robert: Now hold up, Slickback.
A Pimp Named Slickback: No, that's "A Pimp Named Slickback."
Robert Freeman: That's what I said - "Slickback."
A Pimp Named Slickback: No no!, It's "A Pimp Named Slickback," like A Tribe 
Called Quest, you say the whole thing: "A Pimp Named Slickback"!
Robert Freeman: Can we call you "Slickback" for short?
A Pimp Named Slickback: No, nigga! I'm "A Pimp Named Slickback!"
Robert Freeman: Cristale, who is this person?
A Pimp Named Slickback: NIGGA ARE YOU DEAF? I'm "A Pimp Named Slickback"! Say 
it with me now!
Cristal: He's my pimp!
Robert Freeman: Y-y-your pimp? So you really are a, a-
Cristal/Huey/Riley: Yes, I'm/she's a ho!
A Pimp Named Slickback: C'mon bitch now!
Cristal: A Pimp Named Slickback, can at least have a minute?
A Pimp Named Slickback: A minute?! (short chuckle in disbelief) Let us pray the 
pimp's prayer. (church organ playing) Lord, please pray for the soul of this 
bitch and guide my pimp hand and make it strooong Lord! So that she might learn 
a ho's place. Amen!
Riley: Amen! Yeah!
%
A Pimp Named Slickback then draws his hand back to strike her, but Granddad's 
belt lashes out and catches his wrist.
Robert Freeman: You ain't gonna hit no woman in my house!
A Pimp Named Slickback: What woman, sir? This here's a ho!
Robert Freeman: Not in this house, she's not!
%
(Huey walks into the dining room to find Robert asleep with candles lit, a box 
of tissues and wadded-up tissues next to him)
Robert Freeman: (wakes up) Wh-wh-what? D-don't blow the candles out. She'll 
think no one's home.
Huey: Don't worry, Granddad. Maybe she'll be back tomorrow. (blows out candles)
%
(Two young black men bump into each other walking down the street)
Guy 1: Watch where you walkin' nigga.
Guy 2: ey--ey, what'd you say, nigga?
Huey: (Narrating) Watch closely. You're about to exprience a "nigga moment." 
Webster defines the "nigga moment" as a moment where ignorance overwhelms the 
mind of an otherwise logical negro male...
(The men pull out guns and point them at each other)
Guy 1: What did you say, bitch nigga?
Guy 2: Hey squeeze it, nigga!
Huey: ...Causing them to act in an illogical, self-destructive manner. I.E., 
like a nigga.
(The two men continue shouting at each other, then shoot at each other, missing 
every shot despite being right next to each other)
Huey: Nigga moments are unpredictable...
Guy 2: Hey wait man, wait! This is stupid!
Guy 1: Hey you right, dog. Look, let's put the guns away and go on about our 
business.
Policeman: Freeze!
(Police officers shoot both men down)
Huey: ...but they all end up bad. If they had their own category, nigga moments 
would be the third leading killer of black men behind pork chops and F.E.M.A.. 
It's a fact. Now let's see how a nigga moment affects a white man.
(One of the black men from the first example bumps into a white man)
White Guy: Prick.
Black Guy: Watch where you walking, bitch!
White Guy: What did you… wait a minute…haha, I'm white, hahahahaha! (he 
walks away)
Black Guy: Where you going!? Don't you ignore me! This is a perfectly good 
moment to throw your life away!
Huey: A common misconception about the "nigga moment" is that it can be avoided 
by simply movin' away from niggas. If only it were that easy; see, niggas 
always got a new trick right around the corner.
%
Granddad: Listen up boys, I'm about to sing the new shoe song. (dancing) "New 
shoes! New shoeees, hoo-hoo!" Boy, Nike makes some good shoes.
(Stinkmeanor singing to "Ave Maria" crashing to Dorothy)
Stinkmeaner:(to himself)Now, know nobody's in my space. That's- this a handicap 
parking.
(Continues crashing into Dorothy. With the Freemans hollering, Stinkmeanor gets 
out of his car)
%
(Stinkmeanor's past)
Huey: Every nigga moment begins with a nigga. Without that key element, all 
you're left with is peace and quiet. Colonel H. Stinkmeaner is and always has 
been a cantankerous, ornery old man. He spent his childhood disagreeing with 
most things - especially things involving happiness, unity, and kindness. 
Stinkmeaner got no pleasure seeing sunsets and trees, dolphins or rainbows.
Young Stinkmeaner: Man, dis some ol' bullshit.
Huey: So he didn't particularly mind when at age 15, he lost his sight to 
cancer.
Young Stinkmeaner:(boasting at the doctor) At least I don't have to look at 
your ugly ass no more!
Huey: Doctors gave him 3 years to live. So he dedicated those 3 years to spread 
in a lifetime of misery of hatred. Nobody knows how Stinkmeaner managed to live 
so long. He believed it was his love of hatred that kept him going.
%
Stinkmeaner: Who in the hell parked in my space? That's like calling 
1-800-collect an ass-whoopin'. And no, that ain't no toll-free call, PARTNAH!
Granddad: You hit my car! Are you blind?
Stinkmeaner: Yes I am! So?
Granddad: (in disbelief) Wait, you're blind?
Stinkmeaner: Yes! Blind! You got a problem with that, nyuggah?
Huey: You coulda killed somebody!
Stinkmeaner: Bah, I'd be doin' them a favor! Gettin' run over by me is as close 
to an honorable death as most of these people gonna get! Some days, I'm quite 
the humanitarian. (fondly) I think I hit a wheelchair on the way over here.
Granddad: Oh, look what you did to Dorothy! You better have insurance.
Stinkmeaner: Nyuggah, you betta have insurance! Ass whoopin insurance! And 
you're about to pay, a deductible!
Huey:(narrating) And just like that, my Granddad was trapped in a nigga moment. 
At this point, Granddad can (a) walk away and let insurance handle the damages 
to the car or (b) fight with a dumb, crazy, blind nigga. Let's see which one he 
chooses...
Stinkmeaner: Ha ha ha! That's right! I backed into yo' car, nyukka! Whatchu 
gonna do?! WHATCHU GONNA DO?!
Riley: Oh, hell naw! Grandad, let's whoop this nigga's ass right now!
Stinkmeaner: Bitch-ass, fagget-ass, punk-ass, pussy-ass, bitch-ass nyuggah! You 
wanna do somethin' BITCH-ASS NYUKKA?! Hold up! [sniffs] I smell new shoes!
Riley:(in the background) Aw, man!
[Granddad trying to doubt on what will happen next as Stinkmeaner gives him a 
sinister smile]
Riley:(Stinkmeaner stomps on Granddad's new shoes)Oh!! Not the shoes!
Grandad: Fool, whatchu- Ay!
Huey:(narrating) I've said it before. Expensive sneakers are like a 150 dollar 
landmines. Step on one and BOOM!! A perfectly, rational black man can explode.
Riley:(in the background while Stinkmeaner is talking) Granddad, I know you 
didn't let that nigga step on yo shoes!!
Stinkmeaner: Yeaah! They ain't new anymore are they...NYUGGA!!
Riley:(As Granddad growls)And that nigga spittin' on you, you betta get him 
Granddad! Hit him! Hit him!
(Granddad yells taking a swing at Stinkmeaner with his fist)
Riley: Yeeah! Get him!
(Stinkmeanor dodges and trips Granddad with his cane, and Granddad collapses to 
the ground)
Riley: Oh, man! What happened?!
(Stinkmeaner prepares to strike on Granddad with his white cane)
Granddad: Huh? Uh-oh, Uh-oh...
Stinkmenaer:(howlers like a monkey facing diagonally up) AAAHHHHHH, 
Yeah! :[Hits Granddad on the knee]
Riley:(while Granddad is in pain) Gran-Granddad! Get up that nigga blind! 
Watchu doin'?!
Granddad: My bad knee! Oh, lordy, lordy lord. My knee, my bad knee.
(Huey picks up and runs towards Stinkmeaner)
Riley: Man! Aw, man!! You losin' all yo pimpstatic.
(Stinkmeaner is blocked by Huey holding Granddad's cane, before taking another 
hit at Granddad)
Huey: This fight is over.
%
On the awkward car trip home, the song of "Eye of the Tiger" by Survivor (band) 
is playing on the radio.
Radio: It's The Eye Of The Tiger / It's the thrill of The Fight! / Standing up 
to the challenge of your rival!
(Granddad switches off the radio)
Granddad: (sourly) I hate this damn song.
Riley: I can't believe you got your ass kicked by a blind man, Granddad!
Granddad: My knee went out. You know I got a bad knee.
Riley: Bad knee?! That nigga had bad eyes! He couldn't see, Granddad! He beat 
you like a piñata! (to Huey) Yo, we should rent Granddad out for Mexican 
birthday parties! We can call him "Sr. Piñata"! Hola, Sr. Piñata!
Granddad: Stop it, boy, stop it! Where's my belt!?
%
(Dorothy the car has just pulled into their garage)
Riley: I must be blind too, cuz I sho' didn't see that ass-whuppin' comin'!
%
(entering the house)
Granddad: Boy...
Huey: Riley...!
Riley: Yo, how bad you gotta telegraph yo' punches for a blind nigga to see 'em 
comin', Granddad?!
Huey: Riley, the man obviously had a heightened sense of hearing!
Riley: Oh, I thought Granddad had a heightened sense of falling!
Granddad: Now, that's enough! Now, you just stop laughin' at your Granddaddy! 
What's wrong with you?
Riley: Granddad had "HIT ME" written on his forehead in braille!
Granddad: I said that's ENOUGH!
Riley: Okay, What you gonna do? Beat me? Maybe I should get a blindfold first; 
(Riley covers his eyes with his hands) Okay, I'm ready! Wait-maybe he's gonna 
fall on me! (Riley gets on his knees and uses his left arm to cover his eyes 
and his right is pointed up at Granddad to push him off if he falls on him and 
Riley laughs)
Huey: Riley, stop!
Riley: (on the floor now, cringing from laughter) Granddad, Rodney King just 
called and said, "Damn! I thought I got my ass whupped!" (Riley laughs 
uncontrollably until Huey kicks him and Granddad walks off in shame)
%
Huey dreams of a sword fight in a moonlit bamboo forest.
Huey (v/o): That night I dreamt of a blind swordsman. (the fight begins) He 
knows my every move, yet he cannot see. As my mind fights to make sense of the 
impossible, he is turning my sight into a liability. (Fighting continues as 
Huey dodges the samurai's quake) He has no just cause to want my life. There is 
no forethought, no logic in his actions. (blind samurai slashes Huey's leg, 
Huey falls) This isn't just any swordsman. This is the blind nigga samurai.
Blind Samurai: (Stinkmeaner's voice) What's good, nyuggah?! What's REALLY good?!
%
(Huey wakes up startled from the dream)
Huey:Niggas...
%
Granddad's Answering Machine: You have reached the Freeman residence. If this 
is a lovely cutie pie, please leave a message. Everybody else just hang up 
right now because I'm not interested.
Ruckus: Hello, Robert, pick up the phone. Pick up the phone! I know you there 
in hiding. I seen you on the news. Getting your black ass whupped by that blind 
old monkey. That's why they shouldn't let niggas go shoppin'. Call me back. 
(Granddad walks away from machine) Don't you walk away from this answering 
machine!
%
[Grandad is now out in a park along with Huey and Ruckus training for his 
rematch with Stinkmeaner]
Ruckus: Between you and me, your grandaddy shouldn't have too much to worry 
about. Everybody knows niggas can't fight.
Huey: I'm sorry?
Ruckus: You heard me nigga: Niggas can't fight! They ain't got the strength or 
character or the mental quickness to be a great fighter. That's why all the 
greatest fighters in the world have always been white men. Jack Dempsey, Rocky 
Marciano, "Sylvester" Stallone, and don't forget Ralph Macchio. Name me one 
great, black heavyweight champion. Go ahead, name one! See, right there, you 
can't! [Huey is clearly ignoring him by now] O-o-o-oh, what, you gonna pull Ali 
out your ass? Is that what you're thinking about? Muhammad Ali? Well if that 
nigga's so tough, why didn't he go to Vietnam? I'll tell you why: It's 'cause 
he was scared! That's why! Shoot, "No Vietnamese ever called me 'nigga'." I'll 
call him a nigga eight times before I have breakfast! What he gonna do--hold 
up; I'll make it nine! NIGGA!
%
[later on, clearly not aware that nobody's paying him any attention]
Ruckus: Jean-Claude Van Damme is the greatest martial artist in the world. He 
killed a man with his butt-cheek power! Steven Seagal, David Carradine, Chuck 
Norris; shoot! Walker Texas Ranger? Now that's a karate man right there!
%
Huey: You must train.
Granddad: I won't fail you. I'm not afraid.
Huey: Oh you will be, you will be.
%
Huey: Granddad, the only way to win is not to fight.
Tom: That's right, Robert. Nobody's gonna call you a "fruity-boy" or a 
"pansy-pants" if you don't do this.
Riley: I will.
Tom: Right, well... Riley will.
%
Stinkmeaner: You scared? Yeah you scared ain't you bitch nigga. I can smell the 
bitch in ya. Oh, that's vintage bitch. You must have Alzheimer's, old man. You 
already forgot that ass whuppin'. Uh oh... I hear you comin'.
Huey: (narrating) And as I watched Stinkmeaner move blindly around the ring, I 
had a terrifying realization: he wasn't a trained swordsman and he didn't have 
super hearing. He was a blind old man who had just gotten lucky. (shouting) 
Granddad! Wait! No! Stop!
%
(The world freezes just before Granddad lands a fatal blow on Stinkmeaner)
Huey: (narrating) You know, we could all be reading a book right now.
(Time continues, and Granddad kills Stinkmeaner with a final punch to the mouth)
Riley: Dang, granddad, you didn't have to kill 'em.
Huey: (narrating) And so granddad emerged from the nigga moment victorious.
%
[Tom is dreaming: In the jail shower, naked inmates shower, while Tom visibly 
shaken, drops the soap.]
Tom: NNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Various Inmates: You hear something? What? Huh? Oooohhhhhhhhhhh yeah.
Tom: [crying]
Health Inspector: Soap dropped, nigga.
[Tom gasps]
Health Inspector: Oh, you think you just gon' leave it down there?
Tom: N-no ...
Health Inspector: Huh? We don't waste no muh-fuckin' soap in here.
Tom: I'm... I'm finished.
Health Inspector: Naw. Naw, nigga. You ain't finished. I been watchin' you.
Tom: You have?
Health Inspector: You ain't wash behind your ears and nothin'.
Tom: But I did...
Health Inspector: Look at me. See how I'm all clean, glistenin' an' shit? Dat's 
hygiene, nigga. You could call me the Health Inspector. NOW PICK UP THE SOAP!!
[Tom bends down to pick it up, obviously afraid]
Various Inmates: Pray, baby, pray! I'm next.
[Tom wakes up screaming]
Sarah: [sleepily] Dropped the soap again?
%
White House Spokesman: And so, we're raising the Terror Alert Level to intense 
orange-red based on very credible, detailed information on a non-specific 
threat. Could it be a hijacking? Absolutely possible. Chemical or biological 
agent? You bet it could happen. Suicide bomber? Hey, ya never know. But what we 
do know is that it's absolutely, positively gonna happen today, maybe.
Jazmine: (hysterical) Terrorists have my daddy!
Huey: Jazmine, calm down!
Jazmine: Terrorists kidnapped my father and they're going to cut off his head 
in Algeria! My daddy was supposed to be home from work before school let out 
and he isn't here. And we're at terror alert level orange! Orange!!
Huey: Jazmine, just because your dad is late coming home from work doesn't mean 
that...
(Phone rings)
Riley: (answers the phone) Hello?
Tom: (frantic) Riley. Is that you? Put your brother on, it's an emergency.
Riley: What's the emergency?
Tom: I'm in jail.
(slight pause, Riley starts to laugh)
Riley: Don't drop the soap. (hangs up)
Huey: Who was that?
Riley: (the phone rings, and he answers it again) Yeah?
Tom: RILEY. It's Tom.
Riley: I thought you only get one phone call from jail.
(Huey grabs the phone)
Huey: Who's this?
Tom: Huey! I got arrested! They say I fit the description. I think it's 'cause 
I'm black Huey! You have to get me out of here Huey. You don't wanna know what 
they'll do to me in jail.
Huey: They'll rape you that's what they're gonna do. But you're not in jail, 
you're in holding, and I don't think people usually get raped in holding; hold 
on. (yelling) Granddad, do people get raped in holding?
(Jazmine starts to cry)
Tom: Stop stop stop! I don't want your granddad to know. I don't want anybody 
to know. Listen they can't keep people in holding over the weekend. At nine 
o'clock tonight, they're going to put me on a bus and send me to real jail. 
Real jail! Earliest I can get out would be on Monday.
Huey: Well it's just the weekend.
Tom: It only takes one night to get anally raped! Huey, the only way for me to 
get out of here is if you find the real killer tonight.
Huey: The real killer?! Nigga, I'm ten! How am I gonna find the real killer?
Tom: Please! You gotta try...
Huey: Alright alright alright. Damn.
Tom: Thank yooou Huuey. Whatever you do, don't tell my baby Jazmine. I don't 
want her to know her daddy was somebody's biiittcch! (he starts weeping)
Jazmine: Was that Daddy? Where is he? Is he okay? Was he kidnapped by 
terrorists?
Huey: Umm... your father wants you to know he's nobodys' bitch.
Jazmine: (starts to cry again)
%
(approaching Gin Rummy's home, Ed III and the Freeman brothers ring his 
doorbell and Rummy answers)
Gin Rummy: OH, SNAP! Ed Wuncler III!
Ed III: My man, Gin Rummy! What's good, man?
Gin Rummy: 'S'all good, baby. I was just makin' some breakfast; come on in.
(Huey and Riley look at each other confusedly)
(Cut to Rummy's kitchen; he cracks two eggs into a pan to fry them)
Gin Rummy: Sounds to me like you got yourselves a fugitive of justice. I say 
you came to the right hombre.
Huey: Look, we have exactly four hours and forty-five minutes to find the X-Box 
Killer. Can you help us do it?
Gin Rummy: I'd be dead on his ass like Spenser For fuckin' Hire. I'll hunt him 
down and feed him his own testicles. And I'll do it in a jiffy. And I don't 
care if his mama there, his grandmama, innocent bystanders, little kids, 
baby-sitters, bill collectors. Whatever! I'll leave his whole block filled with 
hot brass if I have to. And you know why? Because I just don't give a fuck! 
(the yolks on his eggs pop and Rummy, perfectly calm now, continues) Y'all sure 
you don't want no breakfast? I got some English muffins and peach jelly.
Ed III: (approaching Huey and Riley who are still in slight bewilderment from 
Rummy's rant) See? I told you my boy was gangsta! Hey, man, put some links with 
them grits, Rummy. Shit, I'm hungry as a muthafucka!
%
Tom: (crying) Why are you doing this to me?
Interrogator: You know what this is man. It's fuckin' racism, man. You were at 
the wrong place at the wrong time and you just happen to fit the description. 
Now, if you admit that you killed him...
Tom: BUT I DIDN'T KILL ANYONE!
Interrogator: Look, even if you didn't kill anyone, just admit that you killed 
him. I promise you won't go to jail. Smack on the wrist, I promise you.
Tom: W-wait, stop this. You can't be serious. I'm a prosecutor, I'm never gonna 
fall for this.
(Time on the clock advances ten minutes)
Tom: (between sobs) So, you say that if I confess, I won't go to jail?
Interrogator: I give you my word.
Tom: N-no anal rape?
Interrogator: No anal rape.
(Tom smiles through tears and a runny nose)
%
Riley: So y'all was in Iraq together?
Gin Rummy: Yeah we was in Iraq.
Riley: What did you do?
Gin Rummy: We was looking for weapons of mass destruction.
Riley: ....Did you ever find them?
Gin Rummy: You know goddamn well we ain't find 'em. What are you some kinda 
POLITICAL HUMORIST?! You GARRY TRUDEAU up in dis bitch?!?!
Ed III: I was lookin' for bitches but they had that carpet shit all over them 
and I couldn't see what they look like. All that was really exposed was the 
eyes and that wasn't enough for me, cause you know shit I'm lookin' at the 
eyes, the eyes be pretty and I take the carpet off and then I got a tragedy.
Gin Rummy: But nah we ain't find 'em. but I always say the absence of evidence 
is not the evidence of absence.
Riley: What?
Gin Rummy: Simply because you don't have evidence that something does exist 
does not mean that you have evidence that something doesn't exist.
Riley: What?
Gin Rummy: What country you from?
Riley: What?
Gin Rummy: "What" ain't no country I ever heard of. They speak english in 
"What"?
Riley: What?
Gin Rummy: ENGLISH, MUTHAFUCKER!! DO YOU SPEAK IT!?
Riley: Yeah!
Gin Rummy: So you understand the words I'm sayin' to you.
Riley: Yeah!...
Gin Rummy: Well what I'm sayin' is that there are known knowns and that there 
are known unknowns but there's also unknown unknowns. Things we don't know that 
we don't know.
Riley: ...What?
Gin Rummy: SAY WHAT AGAIN! SAY WHAT AGAIN! I DARE YOU! I DOUBLE DARE YOU 
MUTHAFUCKER! SAY WHAT ONE MORE TIME!
%
Gin Rummy: Ain't nobody seen nothin'.
Huey: I know who did the killing. I've known for twenty minutes. Guy's name is 
Terrell Jackson, he's been braggin' about it all day. Everybody knows. He lives 
five minutes away. I've got MapQuest directions right here.
Gin Rummy: How'd you find all this out?
Huey: We've talked to people!
Riley: I got a picture.
Gin Rummy: Where you get that?
Riley: I drew it from the description of the dude that they gave us while y'all 
was whuppin' niggas' asses in the street. I almost had time to color it.
%
(Rummy and Ed III watches Officer Frank closely as he and Ed III approach the 
counter.)
Rummy: (Speaks to Ed III.) Watch my back I got yo front.
(Gin Rummy and Ed III place the cartons on the counter.)
Clerk: Hey Ed, Rummy my close friends and allies it is good to see you.
Ed III: (Hands Riley two cartons.) Go put dis in tha truck.
Riley: (Approaches the door.)
Clerk: Hey slow your roll chief. You guy have to pay for that first.
Riley: (Stops at the door at the clerk's words.)
Ed III: Damn! Chill out Aladdin Hussein. You know I'm good for it.
Clerk: Hey guys you know the rules. No exceptions, cash only.
(Gin Rummy and Ed III looks back at Officer Frank.)
Officer Frank: (Look at the others at the counter and and gives a friendly 
smile.)
Ed III: Look, he got a weapon! (Pulls out his hand gun and points it at the 
clerk.)
Officer Frank: (Quickly drops the magazine and point his gun at Rummy and Ed 
III.)
Rummy: Whoa, wait a minute now, (Points his M-16 at the clerk.) Put the gun 
down.
Clerk: Gun? What gun? I'm not holding gun. Guys it's me. Ed, your father help 
me build this store.
Rummy: (Looks at Officer Frank holding his gun at him and Ed III. Then he looks 
back at the clerk.) I DON'T KNOW YOU MUTHAFUCKER! NOW, PUT DOWN THE WEAPON, PUT 
IT DOWN!!
Clerk: There is no weapon, look!
Rummy: DROP THE WEAPON!!
Officer Frank: (Trembling nervously.) I, I don't see a weapon!
Huey: (Points at Rummy and Ed III.) There is no weapon, they're robbing the 
store!
Clerk: (Pleading) I am not holding a weapon! (Closes his eyes and looks away.) 
I AM NOT HOLDING A WEAPON!
Rummy: OFFICER, THIS MUTHAFUCKER GOT A GUN POINTED AT YOU!! YOU WANNA DIE!?
Officer Frank: WHAT?!
Rummy: DO-YOU-WANNA-DIE!?
Officer Frank: I-I DON'T WANNA DIE!
Huey: He does not have a gun!
Rummy: HE DOES HAVE A GUN, TRUST ME!! THE ABSENCE OF EVIDENCE IS NOT THE 
EVIDENCE OF ABSENCE!!
Officer Frank: I-I DON'T SEE A GUN!
Ed III: Man fuck this shit! (Point his gun at Officer Frank.) Whose side you 
on? Mine, or this muthafucker who's obviously of terrorist descent?
Officer Frank: (Ponders for a moment.) Wait, I think I can see the gun now!
Rummy: (Climbs up on the counter.) GOOD, NOW ALL SEE THE WEAPON!! NOW YOU HAND 
OVER THAT WEAPON ON THE COUNT OF THREE, OR I SWEAR TO ALL MIGHTY "GOD", I'LL 
BLOW YOUR FUCKIN' HEAD OFF!! ONE!!
Clerk: I CAN'T GIVE YOU A WEAPON I'M NOT HOLDING!! YOU'RE THINKING OF THE 
KOREAN SHOP, NORTH OF HERE!
Rummy: TWO!!
Officer Frank: Is he... still holding it!?
Huey: He-is-not-holding-a-weapon!
Rummy: TIMES UP!!
Clerk: (Ducks under the counter just as Rummy and Ed III open fire.)
%
Rummy: I didn't think that they'd actually shoot back at us.
Huey: Well of course they're shooting back at us! You're robbing their store!
Rummy: You can't assume that people are going to shoot back at you! It was an 
unknown unknown!
Huey: Need I remind you that this has nothing to do with our original plan!
Rummy: Damn it Huey! Robbery etiquette says you can't criticize a robbery plan 
during the actual robbery. You have to wait 'til the robbery's over.
Rummy: Yo, officer. Whatever your name is.
Officer Frank: My name's Frank.
Rummy: Okay, Fred... whatever. Look, I want you to know, you are not going to 
die...(slight pause) in vain.
Officer Frank: I don't think I'm dying.
Rummy: Oh well, I want you to know you weren't mortally wounded... in vain.
Officer Frank: Actually, I think I'm gonna make it.
Ed III: You hear that you sweaty bastards! Freddy ain't dead, Freddy say bring 
it on, bitch! BRING IT!
%
Notice at the beginning of the episode: The following is a completely fictional 
work of satire. Any similarities with actual rappers is totally, completely, 
coincidental.
%
Also, I ain't dissin' nobody's city, or region, or... whatever geographic 
affiliation you got. I love everybody.
%
Seriously. I really don't want any of you niggas running up on me at the club. 
I don't have no crew, and they don't pay me enough to hire bodyguards. I know 
how ya'll niggas do. It's just jokes, man.
%
Dictated. Not read. The management.
%
Huey: (narrating) So, what had happened was Gangstalicious was doing a show in 
town when three men rushed the stage and shot him. Ironically, he was doing his 
new joint "I Got Shot" at the time.
Gangstalicious: (rapping) I got shot!
Crowd: (repeating) I got shot!
(Three men rush the stage and shoot Gangstalicious.)
Gangstalicious: I got shot!
Crowd: (still repeating) I got shot!
Gangstalicious: No, I got shot for real!
Crowd: I got shot for real!
Gangstalicious: No goddammit, I got shot! Niggas shot me! I'm bleedin'! I'ma 
die! Somebody please, help me, help me... (he faints)
Crowd: No goddammit, I got shot! Niggas shot me! (fades into mumbling)
Huey (narrating) It was 45 minutes before anyone called an ambulance.
%
Riley: (Narrating) I was so desperate for information on the shooting, I 
watched that show my brother calls "The News."
Black Witness: OH, SHIT!!! Aw nigga, I seent it! I seent the whole thang, 
nigga. You shoulda seent that shit I saw...
Huey: Oh, great. Black guy witnessman. I HATE black guy witnessmen!
Riley: Nigga, shush! Shhh!
Black Guy Witnessman: ....With my own eyes, nigga. DAMN, that shit was crazy, 
nigga. I seent everything. (his phone rings) Hold up. Yeah, nigga, that's me on 
tv BAYBAY! YEAH, NIG-GUH, YEAH! Nah, I ain't got your money, nigga.
A lady screams, and attention turns towards her.
Black Woman : OOOOHHH JESUS!!!! It was terrible! I was in the club... an-and 
see, I was in the club, and this bitch stepped on my shoe, and I was like 
'BITCH!' and then some niggas started shootin'. I'm like, 'there he go!' He 
done fucked it up for everybody!
%
Riley: Gangstalicious got shot!
Grandad: Again?
Riley: We gotta do somethin'!
Huey: I know! Let's both go to college so that we don't end up like 
Gangstalicious!
Granddad: That boy got shot again? That's a shame.
Riley: A shame? Granddad, a nigga steppin' on your sneakers is a shame! This is 
a catastrophe! It's catastrophic!
%
Granddad: The store...and back. That's it. No hospital. Take my phone, so I can 
reach you but don't call anyone.
Riley: Dang, Granddad! Is this a cell phone or a cordless pay phone?
Granddad: Shut up!
Riley: This thing looks like a laptop!
Granddad: Stay away from that hospital!
Riley: (narrating) I headed straight for the hospital.
%
Riley: Excuse me, I'm lookin' for Gangstalicious.
Receptionist: And who are you?
Riley: I'm one of his many illegitimate children.
Receptionist: Fifth floor.
%
Granddad: (watching a music video) What the hell is thuggin' luv? Who would 
want thuggin' luv? Is that when you make love to your woman and right before 
that "special moment", you beat her upside the head, snatch her purse, and 
throw it down the stairs?
%
Granddad: (calls Riley on the cell phone) Where's my goddamn orange juice, 
boy?! You hear me?! Whatchu doin'-- growin' the oranges?!
%
Riley: (watching Gangstalicious put on his clothes) Damn, nigga, you short.
Gangstalicious: Y-Y-Y-Y-You don't understand. I know this guy, he is crazy. He 
like, uh, uh... got a chemical imbalance or something.
Riley: I'm just sayin' man, you look much taller in the videos.
Gangstalicious: DO YOU HEAR WHAT I AM SAYIN' TO YOU?! THE NIGGA'S A 
RAGEAHOLIC!! We both gonna die! (He starts crying)
Riley: What happened to "I don't fear no man but God?"
Gangstalicious: Correction: God and the nigga that shot me! Oh, lord. What is 
we gonna do?
Riley: Man, just get yourself together! You making me scared.
%
(The Gangsters pursue Riley through the halls of the hospital, who loses them 
at an intersection. As the gangsters stop and look around, Uncle Ruckus comes 
around the corner, mopping the floor, oblivious to their presence.)
Uncle Ruckus: (singing) Colored folks talkin' about 'Save Me!' / Wasn't nothin' 
wrong with slavery! / At least we got good food back then -- uh huh, uh huh! / 
White man sho could be yo frie-
(The gangsters all point their guns at Ruckus. He looks up, surprised.)
Uncle Ruckus: ...Uh...
Lincoln: (coldly) Where's Gangstalicious?
Uncle Ruckus: (thinks for a moment) I'm sorry, I couldn't hear ya over the 
sound of me shittin' myself.
%
Gangstalicious: (men are shooting at them) WE GONNA DIE!
Riley: Run nigga! (they run) Where's your gun?
Gangstalicious: Oh, yeah yeah! Ya'll niggas is in for it, now! (takes out his 
gun, shoots feebly three times, then drops the gun and runs)
(cut to parking lot)
Riley: We need a car. We gon' have to jack someone. Where's your gun?
Gangstalicious: I dropped the gun.
Riley: You dropped the gun?
Gangstalicious: What's done is done, let's be solution oriented. (looks around 
and then looks at Riley) Do you mind?
Riley: How you gonna drop the gun, Gangstalicious? That is NOT gangsta! That's 
VERY not gangsta! Man, I can't believe this. YOU A FRAUD!
Gangstalicious: Oh I'm a fraud? You scared too!
Riley: I'm eight.
Gangstalicious: OKAY, FINE! FINE! WHATEVER! I'm a fraud, I'm a fraud. I'm just 
an average, normal dude. I DON'T WANNA DO THIS STUPID SHIT NO MORE!! I'm tired 
of gettin' shot. Help!
Riley: It's like going to heaven and finding God smokin' crack!
%
Gangstalicious: (he and Riley are locked in a car's trunk) You know who my 
favorite rapper was when I was your age? Ice Cube.
Riley: The dude that makes family movies? He was a gangsta rapper?
Gangstalicious: He was so gangsta. I used to have dreams that Ice Cube came to 
my house and killed my whole family. And for some reason, I thought he was so 
cool, and I wanted to be him. When I started to act like that, like a killer, 
people liked me, girls and them, but, I really wasn't that person. It finally 
caught up with me. I'm sorry you got caught in the middle.
%
Jazmine: It's time to take the 'hoooo's' out of the music videos and put 'em in 
your mouth. Somebody say, "Ho Ho Ho." You see, nowadays everybody thinks "ho ho 
ho" means the Hilton Sisters standing next to Nicole Richie.
%
Riley: (throws chair at Santa, then hits him with a golf club) That's yo ass, 
Santa. I'm gonna get that ass. (sees the security guards coming) Uh-oh. (He 
flees)
Santa: What the fuck? You're all just gonna stand there and watch me get my ass 
kicked? Nobody had my back? Huh? Nobody's got Santa's back? Ain't this a bitch. 
(Gets into some kid's face) That's fucked up with ya'll.
Child: Santa said the F-Word?
%
Huey: You want me to direct the Christmas play?
Mr. Uberwitz: Absolutely. I think you’ll do a fantastic job.
Huey: First of all, I don’t give a damn about Christmas.
Mr. Uberwitz: You don’t have to do a traditional Christmas play... no, you 
can do... whatever you want.
Huey: You’ll be fired.
Mr. Uberwitz: Fired? For what?
Huey: For bein’ an irresponsible white person.
Mr. Uberwitz I would really love to see your vision.
Huey: Vision? What do you know about my vision? My vision would turn your world 
upside down, tear asunder your illusions and send the sanctuary of your own 
ignorance crashing down around you. Now ask yourself: are you really ready to 
see that vision?
Mr. Uberwitz: We’ll give you complete creative control.
Huey: (considers for a moment) I want it in writing.
%
Huey: Granddad? Granddad!
Granddad: I'm sorry boy... what was that?
Huey: I just explained the entire history of Christmas!
Granddad: But it was BO-RING HU-EY! You're just "blah blah, gay sex, blah blah, 
Congress!"
%
Riley: Dear Santa, you are a bitch nigga. Wait hol'up. hol'up. hol'up. (he 
erases) Dear Santa, you are a bitch ass nigga. I heard the mall is hiring extra 
security to protect you. That's a bitch move, Santa. I'm coming for that ass 
again until you pay what you owe. Sincurrly yours, the Santa Stalker.
%
Jazmine: I think you should do a play about what Christmas is really about. 
Christmas is about how Santa died for our gifts and rose from the dead and 
moved to the North Pole and because of that, every year Santa comes down to 
forgive us our sins and give us eternal presents.
Riley: Man, Santa deez nuts! Where was Santa when we was in the hood, huh? 
Santa ain't showin' nigga no love back then! I didn't ask for much... just 
rims. Not even the whole car. And what did we get? -Nuttin ! That nigga gon' 
pay what he owe!
%
Huey: Have y'all lost your damn minds? Opening night is less than two weeks 
away and y'all wanna party?
Kid: We're just having some fun.
Huey: Fun? Do I look like Charlie Brown?
Kid: No...
Huey: Do I LOOK like Charlie Brown?!
Huey: You know what? All y'all are fired!
Kids: (collectively) What? Fired?
Huey: Did I stutter? Beat it!
Mr. Uberwitz: Huey... but it's the entire cast. Are you sure that's a good idea?
Huey: (clears throat) Contract.
Mr. Uberwitz: (to the kids) I'm... sorry guys.
(The kids looks at Quincy Jones.)
Quincy Jones: Hey, don't be lookin' at me.
Huey: Don't look at Quincy Jones! Quincy Jones ain't gonna help you! Get ya' 
asses out! Now!
%
Santa: Well hello, there. And what would you like Santa to bring you for 
Christmas?
Girl: I want- uh, uh... Santa, you got a red dot on your head.
Uncle Ruckus: (diving in slow motion) Nooooooooo!
Riley: (fires gun)
Uncle Ruckus: (he blocks some of the bullets) Ow! Goddamn! That had to pierce a 
spleen or something.
Riley: Merry Christmas nigga!
(Santa uses girl to block bullets and girl screams in pain)
Girl: Santa, why? You ruined my childhood!
Riley: You gonna pay what you owe, Santa! You gonna pay what you owe. Running 
like a bitch.
Uncle Ruckus: (talking on his radio, panting) Backup. I need backup. I'm fat. I 
can't run very fast. I think I'm having a heart attack and a couple of light 
strokes.
Riley: (aims carefully at Santa) Merry Christmas nigga. (gun clicks; empty) 
Damn.
%
Jazmine: Oh, Huey! You’ve got a lunch meeting at 11:30 about the sound 
effects for the dog fight sequence.
Huey: Cancel it.
Jazmine: The PTA is threatening a boycott of the play since you fired all the 
kids.
Huey: (yawning) Don’t care.
Jazmine: And... the principal is in your office to talk about the script.
Huey: Who?
(later, in Huey's office)
Principal: First of all, I just wanted you to know we’re thrilled with the 
script.
Woman 1: Absolutely fantastic.
Woman 2: Brilliant. Wouldn’t change a thing.
Principal: We just had a couple of notes.
Woman 1: One or two.
Woman 2: Nothing significant.
Principal: (flipping through the script) Lets see, uh, there’s a typo on page 
five; uh, there’s a continuity problem on page 32 — I think that scene’s 
supposed to be at night — and, let's see, umm... oh yeah, um, and, uh, Jesus 
can’t be black.
Huey: What do you mean he can’t be black?
Principal: He can't be black. Maybe we can make Jesus another color.
Woman 1: How bout white?
Huey: But Jesus was black.
Woman 2: We could probably do Italian.
Principal: Jesus was Middle Eastern.
Huey: In addition to Arabs, the Middle East has always had many people of 
African descent, whom you would consider black.
Principal: Sorry, can’t do it.
Huey: (Clears throat, presents contract)
Principal: Oh right, that. (he tears it to pieces)
Principal: (leaving) Best of luck.
Woman 1: (leaving) Break a leg.
Woman 2: (leaving) I can't wait for opening night.
(camera shows a disappointed Huey with a poster behind him that reveals the 
chosen title for his play: The Adventures of Black Jesus)
%
Granddad: Get the hell out of there, you ain’t stealin’ my car. (He swings 
a golf club wildly, finally connecting with the camera man, whom he knocks down 
and continues hitting with the club.)
Xzibit: (Later, talking to the camera man) Dude, you got Fucked up by that old 
ass man!
%
Granndad: So you're saying that the car stops, and the wheels keep spinning? 
That's amazing!
%
Jazmine: (wiggling her tooth) The tooth fairy will be coming soon.
Huey: The tooth fairy?
Jazmine: Yup. Everytime I lose a tooth, the tooth fairy takes it away and 
leaves a dollar under my pillow.
Huey: There ain't no such thing as the tooth fairy.
Jazmine: Then who's leaving the money?
Huey: Probably your parents. They have both the cash and the access to your 
room.
Jazmine: Why would they lie to me?
Huey: Because the truth hurts Jazmine. The world is a hard and lonely place and 
nobody gets anything for free. And you want to know what else? One day, you and 
everyone you know is gonna die.
Jazmine: (runs away crying)
Secret agent:You enjoy abusing peoples' illusions. I respect that. It's 
thankless work. (pauses) Do you like my sunglasses? I wear sunglasses because 
my idol Dr. Bill Cosby wears sunglasses all the time, and you know what they 
say: "Cosbiness is next to Godliness."
Huey: Who are you?
Secret agent: Nobody, really. Just thought you might want to talk to someone 
who understands.
Huey: You don't know me.
Secret agent: I know you better than you think, Huey Freeman.
Huey: (surprised, he turns around only to find that the man has disappeared)
%
Riley: All I'm saying is when Xzibit brings that car back you goin' be bitches.
Granddad: What did you call me?!
Riley: No, no... I mean "bitches" like you gonna have so many bitches that's 
what niggas gonna call you. No disrespect.
Huey: No disrespect? You just called your granfather "bitches"!
Riley: Yeah, but I don't mean "bitches" in a desrespectful way. I mean it as a 
general word for women.
Huey: And you're gonna let him get away with this?
Granddad: It's ok. Just this once.
Riley: Granddad, I'm just sayin' you might have to change your middle name from 
Jebediah to Bitches. Is all I'm tryin' say. No disrespect.
Granddad: Hmm, Granddad "Bitches" Freeman. Hoo, has a nice ring to it.
Riley: Shh! Did you hear that?
Huey: What? What is it?
Granddad: I don't hear anything.
Riley: Shh! It's Huey's make-believe government agent in our bathroom taking a 
dump. (snickers)
%
Huey: (speaking to the camera, reality TV "confessional" style) I mean, 
everything we see is a false reality. It's like Big Brother, The Matrix, 
whatever you wanna call it. While we're watching each other, they're watching 
us. All the time.
%
Jazmine: You can believe in secret agents, but I can't believe in the tooth 
fairy? That's messed up Huey.
Huey: Go... Eat something out of a dumpster... You street urchin!
%
Riley: (talking to the camera) I was like, "Man, Granddad done fucked it up for 
everybody!" Oh shit, is he gonna hear me say fuck?
%
Huey: I've come up with a name for you: "The White Shadow."
Secret agent: Hmm... I'm white; I'm shadowing you. It's very clever.
Huey: And I've decided that you're a figment of my over-active imagination.
Secret agent: Now who's hiding from reality? Just because you're paranoid, 
Huey, doesn't mean we're not out to get you.
Huey: If you are real: why me?
Secret agent: Oh come on... You understimate yourself. It's a shame what 
happened to the house. You warned them.
Huey: They wouldnt listen to me; they never listen to me.
Secret agent: I know you want to save the world, Huey, but sometimes people 
have to learn lessons on their own... the hard way. Well (checks watch), can't 
miss the Idol. If you ever want to talk, remember: I'm always listening.
Huey: (narrating) Obi-Wan Kenobi said, "Your eyes can deceive you, don't trust 
them." It seems to be getting harder: distinguishing reality from the illusions 
people make for us, or from the ones we make for ourselves. I don't know, maybe 
that's part of the plan — to make me think I'm crazy... it's working.
%
Riley: Goodnight granddad.
Granddad: (angrily) I'll good your night.
Riley: Goodnight Huey.
Huey: Goodnight Riley.
Riley: Goodnight Huey's imaginary friend(snickers).
Riley: Granddad, Huey's imaginary friend tried to touch me in a private 
place....hahahaha!
Huey: (sighs)
%
Huey: (narrating) Then, on October 15, during an appearance on Politically 
Incorrect, King shocked the country.
Bill Maher: Dr. King: Okay... you're an advocate of nonviolence, but guess 
what? How do you think the United States should respond to the terror attacks 
of 9/11?
Martin Luther King, Jr.: Well, as a Christian, we are taught that you should 
love thy enemy, and if attacked, you should turn the other cheek.
Audience: (in disbelief)
MLK: What?
Huey: (continuing) America was outraged.
(cut to press secretary)
Press Secretary: The president was very concerned by some comments made by some 
"ex-civil rights leaders" and those people in question should uhh... watch 
their goddamn fucking mouths.
(cut to Cable news channel)
News anchor: Of course an Al-Qaeda lover like Martin Luther King wants us to 
just roll over and let the terrorists win... because he hates America. My 
suggestion? Go take another thirty year nap commie bastard.
Huey: (continuing) In December 2001, CNN named Martin Luther King one of the 
ten most unpatriotic Americans. His book was canned; his house was vandalized. 
King renamed his book, Dream Deterred, and it was finally released by a small 
publisher. It was called "unimpressive" by the Woodcrest Post-Gazette.
%
Tom: Well, anyway, Doctor King, I just wanted to say that even though you've 
been catching a lot of flak recently, we're very honored... to meet you. 
Really...
Riley: (to self) Get off his dick... (he's struck under the table by Huey) OW! 
Man I'm just sayin' Mr. Dubois ridin' Dr. King like a rodeo show... (he's 
struck again) OW!
Granddad: Stop it.
Riley: (to MLK) You don't look famous. What are you, an actor? Is you Morgan 
Freeman? (Huey hits him above the table) OW!
Granddad: Boy stop acting crazy. You know that's Martin Luther King. Now go 
clear the dishes.
Riley: Why can't this Morgan Freeman-King dude clear the dishes? Shoot, the 
nigga just had a free meal.
Granddad: Riley! Come here. (he grabs Riley off screen and proceeds to beat him)
%
Huey: Dr. King? (he knocks on his bedroom door) Dr. King... It's time to get 
up, you got an interview today.
MLK: I'm not goin'. I quit.
Huey: Dr. King!
MLK: I don't wanna.
Huey: Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. you get out of that room and continue to 
fight for freedom and justice this instant!
%
MLK: Huey, I just don't think I belong in this new world. I don't know if I 
need the twenty gig iPod or the forty gig... I tried to download some Mahalia 
Jackson, but I lost my iTunes password. (looks over to a picture of himself, 
Gandhi, and Albert Einstein with earphones) I really should have approval over 
this kind of thing.
%
MLK: Oh, snap. No they didn't. A boneless rib sandwich? What will they think of 
next? I know I shouldn't eat these... but, they're for a limited time only... 
(raises his sandwich to see his face on the McWuncler's trayliner and groans) I 
really should have approval over this kind of thing.
%
MLK: (on a cable news talk show) And so the philosophy of this new political 
party might be considered extremely leftist by some people...
Host: (interrupting) Do you love America?
MLK: I'm sorry?
Host: You sure as hell are, buddy. Why can't liberals ever answer that question 
with a simple "yes?" Huh? If you ask me if I love America, I say, "yes!" Why 
can't you say yes? Say you love America right now. Say it.
MLK: (confused) ...The party's basic philosophy is...
Host: (interrupting) Say it!
MLK: Sir, I will not be...
Host: (interrupting) Say it, or SHUT UP! (to the camera) We'll be back with 
more fair and balanced coverage aft... (he's hit with a chair and falls 
backwards)
Huey: (runs on stage and starts punching the host)
%
MLK: Excuse me... brothers and sisters, please (everybody's dancing). Can 
someone just... turn off... (no one pays attention to him)
Huey: (narrating) King looked out on his people and saw they were in great 
need, so he did what all great leaders do: he told them the truth.
MLK: Will you ignorant niggas PLEASE shut the hell up?!
Crowd: (astonished)
MLK: Is this it? This is what I got all those ass-whoopings for? I had a dream 
once. It was a dream that little black boys and little black girls would drink 
from the river of prosperity, freed from the thirst of oppression. But lo' and 
behold, some four decades later, what have I found but a bunch of trifling, 
shiftless, good-for-nothing niggas; and I know you some of you don't want to 
hear me say that word. It's the ugliest word in the English language. But 
that's what I see now — niggas. And you don't want to be a nigga. Because 
niggas are living contradictions. Niggas are full of unfulfilled ambitions! 
Niggas wax and wane, niggas love to complain, niggas love to hear themselves 
talk but hate to explain! Niggas love being another man's judge and jury! 
Niggas procrastinate until it's time to worry! Niggas love to be late! Niggas 
hate to hurry! Black Entertainment Television... is the worst thing I've ever 
seen in my life! Usher, Michael Jackson is NOT a genre of music! And now I'd 
like to talk about Soul Plane... I've seen what's around the corner! I've seen 
what's over the horizon! And I promise you, you niggas have nothing to 
celebrate! And no, I won't get there with you- I'm going to Canada.
%
Huey: (narrating) That was the last time I saw Dr. King, but the story 
doesn’t end there. King’s speech was replayed the entire next day on the 
cable news channels. Then, something unexpected happened: people got angry.
Reporter: Nobody knows exactly what to attribute to the sharp decline in 
African American dropout rates...
Reporter 2: ...every African American player in the NBA refusing to play until 
there is a full troop withdrawal from...
Reporter 3: ...Billionaire Bob Johnson apologizing to Black America for the 
network he founded...
Reporter 4: ...the White House and Congress are receiving an unprecedented 
amount of calls from irate African Americans...
Huey: (continuing)...and the revolution finally came.
(Huge crowd seen protesting loudly in front of the gates of the White House. 
Police shoot tear gas into the crowd.)
Cut to: Newspaper, dated 2020, sub-headline: Martin Luther King Jr. dies in 
Vancouver, B.C. at 91 years old
Zoom out to reveal main headline: Oprah Winfrey Elected President
Huey: It’s fun to dream.
%
Huey: Granddad, is this the broccoli I bought at the store today?
Granddad: Yep. I cooked it up for you.
Huey: You cooked it with the ham!
Granddad: It's pork-flavored broccoli.
Huey: Granddad, there's more pork in the pork-flavored broccoli than there is 
broccoli. We talked about this. Vegetables cooked with pork counts as pork.
%
Sarah: Hey everyone, I brought peach cobbler.
Riley: Ewww... Mrs Dubois, your peach cobbler look like throw up.
Granddad: Boy!
Riley: It do! Look it look like throw up with peas in it. Mrs Dubois, you been 
eatin' peas?
Granddad: Boy come here; what wrong with you?
Riley: What's wrong with me? What's wrong with her? She da one who brought 
vomit over here in a tupperware container.
Granddad: That is not vomit. It just look like vomit. Now apologize to Mrs 
Dubois.
Sarah: Um, i-i-it's okay... really...
Riley: Fine: Mrs Dubois, I'm sorry your peach cobbler look like vomit with peas.
Granddad: Damnit boy!
Sarah: Guys, please, you know we don't have to...
Riley: I don't care if you beat me Granddad, I won't eat it! That is 
disgusting! It's completely uncalled for!
Granddad: You'll eat it if I have to hold you down and shove it down your 
throat.
Sarah: Really I didn't mean for it to be...
Riley: I know what you're tryin' do. You tryin' kill me. I hate you!
(Riley runs out the room with Granddad running after him. Scene shows Huey, 
Jazmine, Sarah and Tom watching Riley getting "whipped" offscreen)
Granddad: You are gonna eat that cobbler and you gonna ACT LIKE YOU LIKE IT!!!
Riley (while Granddad is talking): I don't wanna eat the cobbler! I DON'T WANNA 
EAT THE COBBLER!!!
%
Ed Wuncler Sr.: I own all the businesses on this block. Everything except 
Meadowlark Memorial Park. I've been trying to buy that park for years, but the 
state is trying to butt-fuck me on the price. But we'll see who butt-fucks who.
%
Mexican Immigrant Worker: Señor Wuncler, are we fired too?
Ed Wuncler Sr. (Off-screen): Not the Mexicans!
Crying worker: (stops crying) Hey, I'm half-Mexican!
Ed Wuncler Sr. (Off-screen): Not the illegal Mexicans! (Worker begins crying 
again)
%
Granddad: I present to you...the Luther! A full-pound burger patty covered in 
cheese, grilled onion, five strips of bacon, all sandwiched between-
Riley: Two donuts!
Granddad: Two Krispy Kreme donuts! It's called The Luther because it was 
supposed to have been invented by Mr. Luther Vandross himself!
Huey: Luther Vandross is dead!
Granddad: And? Where's your point? Hm?
Huey: (watches Riley take a bite of the burger) Is this one of your menus? 
Sausage and waffle and fried chicken breakfast lasagna?
Granddad: Yup.
Huey: Bacon-wrapped chitlin-stuffed catfish? Granddad, you can't serve this 
kind of stuff to people! It will cause... death!
Riley:(about the burger he is eating) Woah, this is what crack must feel like!
Granddad: Shame on you, Huey! You move out to the suburbs, and suddenly you too 
good for soul food. Perhaps you prefer cheese in a buttered scone, white boy? 
(Riley passes out) Boy, boy, are you okay?! I'm sure it's just The Itis, right?
Huey: That or insulin shock! Do CPR!
Granddad: Riley wake up!
Huey: Yeah, I'm not sure yellin' at him is gonna help Granddad.
%
Newsman: Alright Ruckus, what's Robert Freeman's secret?
Uncle Ruckus: Well let me just say this here, if there's one thing that a 
colored man is good at, it's cookin' a pig.
Newsman: Well, there you have it.
%
Robert: (to Huey about a server) What did you tell him? What's behind your 
back? (grabs a book that Huey was hiding behind his back) Elijah Muhammad's How 
to Eat to Live. I knew it! Just what joy do you get from trying to crush all of 
my dreams, Huey!? Do you know how long I've wanted to own my own restaurant?
Huey: Three weeks, at Sunday dinner. That was the first time you mentioned it, 
and you only started doing the whole Sunday dinner thing because you saw Soul 
Food on cable!
%
Gin Rummy: Man, I don't get that.
Ed Wuncler III: Get what?
Gin Rummy: That textin' shit!
Ed Wuncler: And what's wrong with textin'?
Gin Rummy: You mean aside from the fact that it's the stupidest f**king thing 
in the world? I mean, why would anyone in their right mind spend fifteen 
minutes tryin' to type some shit they could've called and said in five seconds? 
Plus, it involves typing with your thumbs, which I just don't approve of. Shit, 
I don't know about you, but I don't have time to read nothin' that a 
motherf**ker typed with his thumbs. Fun fact: Nothing typed by someone's thumbs 
has ever been important. It's all just Nigga Technology anyway.
Ed: What'd you call it?
Gin Rummy: Nigga Technology. Technology for Niggas. And you don't start 
trippin' and shit, call me a racist. 'Cause I don't mean Nigga in a 
disrespectful way, I-I mean it as a general term for an ignorant motherf**ker. 
Anybody of any race can be an ignorant motherf**ker.
Ed: Shit, I be textin' my ass off, shit, bitches like text! I be textin' 'em 
all the time; 'matter of fact, I also be textin' my weed man, too, cause, you 
know, he don't like to be on the phone, so I text 'im!
Gin Rummy: ...Case in point.
Gin Rummy: So basically, Nigga Technology is anything that doesn't plug into a 
printer. Does that plug into a printer?
Ed: No.
Gin Rummy: Know why? 'Cause niggas never have anything to print.
%
Ed: I sent that bitch a smiley face. Bitches love smiley faces.
%
Wuncler III: (Looking at his watch after robbing a bank) Twenty-two minutes.
Gin Rummy: We suck! We f**kin suck, man! And, I forgot to ask for the money 
again! I ALWAYS forget to ask for the money!
Ed Wuncler III: I don't think twenty-two minutes isn't so bad
Gin Rummy: Not so bad? That's a whole episode of Seinfeld! It takes us a whole 
episode of Sein-f**kin'-feld to rob a bank!
Ed Wuncler III: Stop bein' such a perfectionist.
Riley: Ed, we both know that if your grandfather didn't own this bank, we 
would've never gotten away with this shit. (cut to a sign in front of the 
building that says Wuncler Savings & Loan)
Ed Wuncler III: SHUT UP, RILEY!!!
%
(Huey and Riley are fighting in the kitchen)
Granddad: Boys...what the hell?!
Riley: I ain't doin' nothin', Granddad! I was just gon' go to Ed's house, and 
Huey said I couldn't go 'cause he a hater!
Granddad: What the hell is wrong with you, Huey? If your brother wants to play 
with Ed and Rummy, that's his business!
Huey: Granddad! Ed and Rummy are international criminals!
Riley: There he go hatin' again!
Granddad: Boy! Stop hatin'!
Huey: What about the time that Riley and Ed were playing with a loaded shotgun, 
and Riley shot Ed out of a second-story window?!
(Cutscene to 'Garden Party' when Riley shot Ed out of the window)
Granddad: Ohhh...that did happen, didn't it?
Riley: Okay, so just 'cause Ed believes in his Second Amendment right to bear 
arms, we can't be friends? What you got against the Bill of Rights, Huey?!
Huey: Okay, how about the time they stopped for gas and ended up robbing the 
mini-mart?!
(Cutscene to 'A Date with the Health Inspector' during the gun fight)
Riley: They was fightin' terrorism! Makin' the world safe for the freedoms that 
we enjoy today! That's messed up, you don't support the troops, Huey!
Granddad: That is kind of messed up, Huey. Be back by dinner.
Riley: Ha!
%
(Ed and Riley are playing Playstation 2)
Wuncler III: This is some bullshit. The game cheatin!
Riley: Nigga the game ain't cheatin'.
Wuncler III: Start the game over!
Riley: Why you always gotta cheat when you lose, Ed!?
Gin Rummy: (to Riley) Let him have it. It's not wise to upset a Wuncler.
(Ed pulls one of his guns out and shoots the game console repeatedly, 
shattering it into pieces)
Wuncler III: (while pointing gun at Riley) Restart the game now!
%
Gin Rummy: Oh, snap! What if we kidnap Oprah?!
Wuncler III: And do what?
Gin Rummy: Control of Oprah is control over women.
Wuncler III: Wait, I see where you're going. See, cause, like, control over 
women...is control over bitches!
Gin Rummy: Oprah Winfrey taps directly into the emotions, beliefs, buying 
habits and summer reading patterns of billions of women all over the world! 
Oprah Winfrey has the power to lay waste to an entire industry with a mere 
utterance! She's a completely invincible, unstoppable force of nature and with 
her under our control...nobody would be able to stop us!
Riley: Who's trying to stop you? Nobody ever tries to stop you.
Gin Rummy: Yes, they do.
Riley: No they don't.
Gin Rummy: Hey, just because we don't know anyone trying to stop us don't mean 
there ain't nobody out there tryin' to stop us. The absence of evidence is not 
the evidence of absence.
Riley: Seems to me like everyone just lets y'all do whatever you want. That's 
why y'all always get away.
Gin Rummy: We get away because I'm a criminal mastermind.
Riley: ...Whatever, nigga.
%
Wuncler III: Well excuse me, for being into computers and shit. Aight?
Gin Rummy: First of all, motherf**ker, just because you put a two-way pager in 
the middle of your desk don't make it a computer. It's a two-way pager, aight?
Wuncler III: Okay. Then, what's the difference?
Gin Rummy: The difference is a computer is something that does actual work. 
Nigga technology don't do much more than let dumb niggas talk to other dumb 
niggas about dumb nigga shit.
%
Gin Rummy: Maya Angelou? Maya "And I Rise" Angelou?
%
Wuncler III: It was all Rummy's fault.
Gin Rummy: Ed ran into the wrong store. I was following Ed.
Wuncler III: How was I suppose to know which bookstore to go into? They look 
exactly the same and they both got books.
Riley: There was a giant crowd of people outside of one.
Wuncler III: That don't mean Oprah was in there.
Riley: There was a large sign outside that said "Welcome Oprah". Y'all are 
lucky Ed's grandfather owns the cops.
%
Wuncler III: (in a pool with water wings on) Hey, why ya'll leavin me out here? 
One of y'all motherf**kers better come out here and get me, I know that, or you 
will be livin in a haunted house tonight!
Gin Rummy: Swim, bitch!
%
Gin Rummy: Whoa. Bushido Brown. Aw, damn, I was afraid of this.
Riley: Who's Bushido Brown?
Gin Rummy: A bona fide bad motherf**ker, that's who. You remember when Oprah 
made them comments about the beef industry?
Riley: No.
Gin Rummy: Okay well, a few years back, Oprah said some shit on her show about 
beef, you know, Mad Cow Disease or some shit. Anyway, the beef industry didn't 
exactly find that shit amusing. They thought they would send a crew of armed 
Texans to go teach Oprah a lesson. Ex-marines, ex-Texas rangers, rouges, that 
kinda shit, but Oprah hired Bushido Brown as her personal bodyguard. 
Apparently, only one dude was able to actually lay a hand on Oprah's office 
door. They say...Bushido Brown kept that hand.
Wuncler III: ...I think I just shit myself.
Gin Rummy: Oh no. We can't just stroll up in there if Bushido Brown is there. 
We need a plan. And um...(to Ed) - Go change your pants.
%
Huey: Pretty strange, huh? Armed gunmen. Assault a bookstore. To kidnap Maya 
Angelou.
Riley: Hey. I heard she had enemies.
Huey: Even stranger, Oprah Winfrey was right across the street when it happened.
Riley: I don't know anything about no plot to kidnap nobody.
Huey: SO..Ed and Rummy DO have a plan to kidnap Oprah.
%
Wuncler III: Isn't that your brother?
%
What's he doin' here?
Riley: He's tryin' to stop you.
Wuncler III: Really?
Rummy: Why? What'd we ever do to him?
Wuncler III: Sound like a hater to me.
Riley: (dials his cell phone) Hello? Yes, there's a little boy comin' right now 
to hurt Oprah. He's got a big stupid afro and a very poor disposition. He's on 
the east side of the buildin'. Aight. Peace.
%
Rummy: (Gunfires) Get down!! Everybody get dow, Now!!!!
Wuncler III: (Throws tear-gas) Wheres Oprah?!!
Rummy: : Well? Where she at?!!
Wuncler III: Wheres Oprah?!! (asks scared guy) Wheres Oprah, punk?! (Melees 
guy) G-yahhhh!!! Bitch!!
Rummy: Tell me where that bitch is. You better tell me where Oprah is on the 
count of 3 or..or..or..or
%
Or I'm gonna kill the oldest bitch up in here!! (Elder ladies look at the 
oldest)
Old Lady #3: That's real f**ked up Agnes!
Wuncler III: I've found her!!
Riley: Body snatcher 3 to Body snatcher 2. Where are you?
Rummy: Were at book store. Were about to extract the package.
Riley: What book store?
Rummy: The Borders. Next to Starbucks
Riley: No!!! Its the Barns & Nobles. Next to the coffee bean.
Wuncler III: G-yahhh!!! Bitch!!!
Cosby:Pull up your pants you ghetto holagan
Rummy:Damn is that who I think it is
Riley:This ain't Oprah,it's Bill Cosby!
Rummy:I guess we were suppose to take a left
%
Riley: And Y'all niggas are gay
%
Huey: (narrating) Ed and Rummy kidnapped Bill Cosby. (pause) But, he was really 
annoying, so they returned him to the studio fifteen minutes later. As usual, 
no one even thought about stopping them. Riley had gotten away, but returned 
several hours later when he realized he had dropped his two-way pager.
Riley: (Leans over to pick up the pager but stops when he notices Huey's 
shadow.)
Huey: (Punches Riley in the face, sending him flying backwards)
Riley: Okay, okay, okay... let me explain...
Huey: (Dragging Riley away and hitting him repeatedly in the head) You must 
have lost your mind! You do not kidnap Oprah!
%
Riley: It wudn't me!
Officer: It says, "Riley was here."
Riley: Well maybe it was another Riley.
Officer: You dropped these pictures (pictures show Riley posing in front of his 
graffiti), and, umm, you have paint all over your hands.
Tom: Riley, graffiti is a serious crime. Now as the assistant district 
attorney, I'd have to arrest you and send you to jail, and you wouldn't want 
that, would you?
Riley: (smirking) Nawwww, 'cause I remember when you got arrested that one time 
and you was cryin' 'cause you thought they were gonna rape you.
Tom: (interrupting) Well, I don't exactly remember it happening like that.
Riley: Yeah it did. The way you was talkin, they was fi'in to wear that ass out.
Tom: (interrupting) Okayyyyy... So we're all agreed that none of us want to go 
to jail.
Riley: And then there was somethin' about a salad, or somethin'?
Tom: (enthusiastically) Yes! Salads! For dinner! They make you eat vegetables 
every night and they're not... delicious... at all.
Huey: Uhhhh, is the cop here for me or Riley?
Granddad: Your brother got caught spraying graffiti on... Wait, why would he be 
here for you?
Huey: Uh, No reason.
Riley: Fine, I knew y'all was gonna find a way to blame me for this. Go ahead! 
Say hello to the bad guy! But a white man told me to do it.
Tom: Wait a minute, what white man? What did he look like?
Riley: White... I just assumed he was in charge.
Officer: Why?
Riley: 'Cause he was white!
Officer: And just what did this white man look like?
Riley: He had a... who do I look like, Snitchy McRat? I don't talk to police!
Granddad: Boy, you better work your mouth!
Riley: If you gonna take me to jail then take me to jail! (he holds out his 
wrists)
Granddad: (scowls)
%
Huey: We all know that the images we see can elicit strong emotional reactions. 
But I always wondered, can the images we see do more than hurt us emotionally? 
Is it possible to see something so bad that it actually hurts you physically? 
In other words, can too much black television kill you?
%
Art teacher: ...and what the heck. Let's have some mountains and some clouds; 
oh, and of course some joyful little trees... right there. (turns to Riley) 
Isn't that beautiful? I love painting trees. What do you like to paint, Riley? 
Hehehheh, aside from your own name, of course.
Riley: I got in trouble 'cause a you. I thought it was yo' house.
Art teacher: It was my mistake. But you'll find I don't really believe in 
mistakes. I believe in "happy accidents." Because you got in trouble, your 
granddad hired me, and we are gonna have so much fun.
Riley: (looks away defiantly)
Art teacher: Well, Riley, I certainly don't want to keep you here if you don't 
want to. Your granddad wants to make sure I make you do just one drawing a day 
— then you can go.
Riley: I jus' gotta draw one thing?
Art teacher: Anything you want, heheh, have fun.
Riley: Cool. (he grabs a pencil and paper and draws something in seconds)
Riley: (walking away, sets the paper down next to the art teacher and heads 
toward the door)
Art teacher: (chuckles audibly)
Riley: (hearing chuckle, turns around) What?
Art teacher: Oh nothing, heheh... you're free to go.
Riley: What's funny?
Art teacher: Nothing, nothing at all. I'll call your granddad and tell him 
you're walking home.
Riley: (aggressively) I wudn't really trying, I could do better if I wanted.
Art teacher: (crumples up Riley's drawing) Oh I'm sure. (he throws it away)
Riley: (surprised, then angry) Hey! You ain't have to ball it up and throw it 
in the trash! You know what? That's disrespectful! Yo' mama shoulda raised you 
better. (he leaves)
Art teacher: (Continues to paint)
Riley: (returns and retrieves his crumpled-up drawing) I wudn't even really 
tryin'. (he leaves again)
%
(the next day)
Art teacher: ...then just do it real quick like before.
Riley: Oh, I get it. Is that how you get yo' kicks? You get little kids to draw 
stuff when they ain't even really tryin' that hard, jus' so you can laugh? You 
sick!
Riley: (walks over to his desk to draw a picture)
Art teacher: (after a few seconds) Finished?
Riley: No, man! Damn, stop sweatin' me! I mean can I draw? Can I put the damn 
lines on the pages, please? Please?!
%
Riley: I wanna paint Scarface shooting at like fifteen Colombian drug lords... 
with bitches!
%
Riley: I can't believe it man! How niggas gon— Man, how niggas gonna just 
come by, and just sign they name on someone else's shit? All after the fact? 
Tryin' to steal my shine! Man, that's some ol' bullshit! DAMN!
Art Teacher: You know, Riley, the moon steals its shine from the sun, and no 
one ever gets the two confused. Take it as a compliment.
Riley: Why can't niggas do them? Huh? Why niggas got to do me? Why niggas go 
to....RIDE ME LIKE A RODEO SHOW?! Why can't they sign on THEY OWN SHIT?!
%
Huey: Wus good y'all? You niggas is makin' a whole lotta noise.
Granddad: Where you been?
Huey: Just, you know, chillin', you know, jus' doin' my little TV watchin' 
thing. You know? Doin' me...
(later; Huey has done nothing but watch black television shows for two weeks.)
Comedian: (on the TV) You know when you takin' a dookie and it's a dump that 
ain't the dookie you wanted to take, but it's the dookie that the dookie wanted 
to take? It's working you over, not like how you wanted... (Riley walks in 
front of the TV)
Huey: Yo! Move! You blocking the TV, nigga!
Riley: (opens an album and takes one of the pictures) Hey, don't tell Granddad 
I left.
Huey: We got any grape soda?
Riley: ...Nigga, you stupid.
%
Art Teacher: It's the police! I don't really like the police very much.
Riley: Me neither!
Art Teacher: Good! Then I'm gonna drive really fast, so we can get away from 
them!... if that's okay with you.
Riley: Yea!
Art teacher: That's great! Hold on...
%
Art teacher: I think it's time we lost these guys.
%
(the art teacher pulls out a gun)
Riley: Oh, um, Granddad... There was something I was supposed to tell you. Uh, 
yea, I think that, uh, Aunt Cookie called and I think it was important.
Granddad: What? Did you write it down?
Riley: Naw, but uh….. It was somethin’ about this dude named Mo.
Granddad: Mo? You mean Mo Jackson?
Riley: Yea yea, that’s him. Uh, I think it was uh, somethin’ about… ooh 
ooh, wait, I remember now… Yea. Somethin’ about him dyin’... or something.
Granddad: Mo’s dead?
Riley: Yeah, I think so. Somethin’ like that. Oh well, I’m not really sure. 
You should prolly call her back.
Granddad: Well, how long ago did she call?
Riley: I dunno. Few days ago?
%
Jazmine:You wanna come over to my house tomorrow after school and watch TV?
Huey: (bluntly) No.
Jazmine: You wanna come over and... play video games?
Huey: No.
Jazmine: Do you wanna come over and... have a jump rope contest?
Huey: I’m goin’ back home to Chicago.
Jazmine: For good?
Huey: No. I wish. We’re goin’ for a funeral — one of my granddad’s old 
friends. I’m gonna get to see my best friend Cairo.
Jazmine: Cairo is your best friend?
Huey: Yeah. But I haven’t talked to him since I moved.
Jazmine: How can he be your best friend if you never talk to him?
Huey: (ponders question for a moment)
Jazmine: I don’t think I have a best friend...
Huey: Sucks for you. (starts walking away) Well, if I never come back, have a 
nice life.
Jazmine: (to herself) Bye.
%
Granddad: What was the question?
Riley: You asked us if we wanted to hear a really long story and we said "no."
%
Huey: Yo, Cairo!
Cairo: (tenuously) Wassup man?
Huey: I been hittin you up.
Cairo: Yeah. You know. Been busy.
Huey: So... wassup?
Dewey: What’s up? Struggle is up, brutha. O-pression is up, brutha. Salami 
eggs and bacon. My name is Dewey Obababa-OOOOOhh-mamase-mamasa-mamakosa... 
Jenkins.
Riley: Nigga, what!?
Dewey: Ohhhhhhh... This must be the famous revolutionary Huey Freeman. Isn’t 
this the brother who used to be your homeboy? But then he ran away to... What 
was that? Whitecrest?
%
Mabeline: Robert? Ooo I can't believe it's you. It Mab'line, I haven't seen you 
in fotie years my goodness. (Licks her lips)
Granddad: (Stares at Mabeline dumbfounded)
Mabeline: Oh, ohh! You don't remember me. Ohh I see, oh ain't good enough fo ya 
now you dun moooved out tha neighborhood, huh? Well I betcha if I was a WHITE 
BITCH YOU'D 'MEMBER ME! But I fo'gives ya. Ho but look attchas Robert. You look 
good all wrinkled up and soft. Whoo, If I didn't have dis bad hip I'd drop it 
like it's hot, whoo! Hoo boy HOO, I'd take off deez teeth and do sum thangs 
that Hoo yeah! Jesus! (Slobbers)
[Granddad screams and runs away]
%
Man: Hey hey, Robert hey! I heard you was going to be delevering the eulogy. I 
think that mighty nice of you. I know you and Mo had some bad blood.
Granddad: Well, what's in the past is in the past.
Man: (Starts laughing) Yeah, I remember how Mo talk about how he couldn't stand 
yo black ass. Woo, ha! I remember it like it was last week. Matter of fact, I 
think it was last week.
Granddad: Last week?!
Man: Aw man, you should have heard him, Robert! He was on ah roll, heh! You was 
all kinds of bitches and motherfuckers! He was like Chappelle or something!
Granddad: He called me a motherfucker last week?! He said that last week?!
Man: Sho did, I think Tuesday. Bout 1:48 PM.
Granddad: Well, ain't this a bitch?
Man: And what surprised me, was you be all kinds motherfuckers really had 
nothing to do with tha damn conversation. What was we talking about? (Puts his 
hand on Granddad shoulder.) Soybeans. Whoo, you a bigger man than me. (Starts 
to walk away.) I don't think I can talk nice about somebody who said that kind 
of stuff bout me or my mama, hmp. I-am-not-the-one.
%
Granddad: I can’t believe I let Mo talk me into this.
Aunt Cookie: Well, you already here. He said he left you something nice. You 
might as well go on and get it over with.
Granddad: (scowls)
Aunt Cookie: Do you know what you gonna say?
Granddad: No.
Aunt Cookie: Well, don’t worry. Just read this (she presents a piece of paper 
to him). Mo wrote it. He thought you might have some trouble.
Granddad: (steps to the podium, starts reading the paper) Everything I have in 
life I owe to Mo Jackson... (looks questioningly at Aunt Cookie)
Aunt Cookie: (urges him on)
Granddad: (tentatively) I have never once been gay, but Mo was a very sexy man. 
We used to call him "Mo bitches"? I once saw Mo in his underwear? And it 
changed my life? I wish I had a father like Mo Jackson. Mo Jackson paid my rent 
over fifty times?! ... Okay this is bullshit!
Audience: (collectively gasps)
Granddad: Mo Jackson was a asshole.
Audience: (collectively gasps again)
Granddad: Mo Jackson was a petty, immature, selfish man. Oh, he was good at one 
thing: that’s bringin’ the worst out of everybody he met. I came up here 
because I thought Mo wanted to make things right. But it was just one more 
chance for him to make a fool out of me. (he walks off stage; people start 
murmuring amongst themselves)
Man Sitting At a Table: Yeah, and that nigga owed me five dollars!
Dewey: (takes the microphone) Brothers, sisters… please. I think it’s time 
for a poem: Doom comes like a vacuum, ‘cause death sucks and smells like a 
raccoon or a baboon... Death kills us like crack killed Pooky... Like 
Schwarzenegger killed Tookie. Chewbacca was a wookie. Revolution.
[The audience sits in silent, stunned confusion.]
Riley: Booo... Hey! "Erykah BaDewey"! That was real gay, my nigga! Cut that out!
Cairo: Shut up, Riley!
Huey: What’s wrong with you Cairo?! That nigga’s corny.
Cairo: Corny? Nigga, you’re corny. At least he’s here! Why don’t you 
follow your punk-ass granddaddy back to Whitesville? Fake nigga?
[Huey punches Cairo in the face and the two start fighting; Dewey looks 
nervously at Riley and flees from the podium]
Riley: [Chasing after him] Don't run, nigga, I see you!
%
[After Granddad's flashback after the war, in which Mo stole a woman he 
remembers as his girlfriend]
Granddad: I just couldn't forgive him.
Aunt Cookie: Robert, that girl wasn't your girlfriend. You asked for her phone 
number once and never called.
Granddad: But I was gonna call. "What's-her-name" could have been the one. Mo 
took that from me.
Aunt Cookie: Robert, you wanna see what Mo took from you?
Mabeline: It's Mabeline nig-guh!
[Granddad recoils in horror and screams]
%
Granddad: (approaches podium once more, sighs) Here’s the thing. 
Relationships are like people, I guess. They begin, they have adventures, they 
grow old, and they die. Me and Mo both made it to old age, but we let our 
friendship die way too young. And that was really stupid of us. Mo thought I 
was good at saying deep things. But I’m not. Huey, say somethin’ deep.
Huey: (not paying attention, having just had his fight with Cairo broken up) 
Huh?
Granddad: I ain’t got all day, boy. Be deep!
Huey: (sighs) "Your pain is the breaking of the shell that encloses your 
understanding. It is the bitter potion by which the physician within you heals 
your sick self. Therefore, trust the physician, and drink his remedy in silence 
and tranquility." Kahlil Gibran.
[The audience is silent and thoughtful]
Dewey: Didn’t rhyme...
Granddad: Thanks for bein’ the bigger man, Mo.
%
Huey: (rings bell, Cairo answers, and is immediately aggressive) I’m sorry...
Cairo: (softens, offers hand)
Huey: (surprised, shakes Cairo's hand)
Cairo: (pulls Huey toward him and head-butts him hard)
Huey: (goes flying off the porch and lands hard on the pavement)
Cairo: (slams door)
Huey: (narrating) Being the bigger man is overrated.
Riley: (standing over him) You got knocked the f– !
[Granddad and Aunt Cookie walk over and glare at Riley.]
Riley: Never mind.
%
Jazmine: (excited, runs toward Huey) You came back! Did you miss me?
Huey: Maybe.
Jazmine: (chuckles) I bet you did. ‘Cause I don’t headbutt you in the face 
like your other so called friends.
Jazmine [chases Huey away] Let me see it!
%
Huey: (to Riley, who's spraying the water out of a hydrant) Riley!
Riley:(looks up) What?
Huey: White people have pools.
Riley: Nigga, what's wit the coat?!
%
Uncle Ruckus: Hey. (To Riley) YOU QUIT PLAYING WITH THE WHITE MAN'S WATER, BOY. 
(To Huey) AND YOU, TURN OFF THAT GODDAMN JUNGLE NOISE.
Huey: WHAT?
Uncle Ruckus: (even louder) YOU HEARD ME. TURN OFF THAT 
GODDAMN...BLACK...AFRICAN...CONGO...JUNGLE...NOISE! (Riley turns water from the 
hydrant to Ruckus) Son of a bitch! (Opens the door to his truck, gets in) I got 
something for yo' black ass! You wait a minute here!
%
News Reporter: The police were responding to a call about a broken fire hydrant 
when they pulled over the suspect here on Timid Dear Lane. The officers 
apparently mistook the suspect's safety orange wallet for a gun and shot at him 
118 times and beat him.
Riley: (being questioned) What did I see? Well, that brings up an interesting 
philisophical question: Is it okay to snitch to the police, on the police?
%
Huey: (talking to man as man walks by) Prozac can lead to suicide.
Jazmine: But lemonade can lead to smiles, which can cause dimples.
Man: (delighted) Dimples? I'll take two!
Jazmine: Thank you. (to Huey) You're good for business!
%
Riley: (still talking to police) I'm not sayin' I do have a videotape, but I'm 
not sayin' I don't, either. Hypothetically speaking, how much would you pay for 
somethin' like that?
%
Jazmine: So when do I get to see Sammy Davis, Jr. the Pony?
Wuncler: (acutely) When you learn how to run a respectable business.
Jazmine: Huh?
Wuncler: What the hell is up with this sign? What's this crude drawing suppose 
to be?
Jazmine: I-it's the M-M-Magical Pony Carriage.
Wuncler: This looks like a kid drew it. Look at this, why are all the "e's" 
backwards?
Jazmine: I-I-It... It's suppose to be c-cute.
Wuncler: You think ignorance is cute? Well, I suppose you think you think 
mental retardation is down right adorable. Lemonade, now! (Jazmine starts to 
cry and tries to pour a glass) How is anyone supposed to believe you can make 
lemonade when you can't even spell it? How old are you?
Jazmine: (crying) T-T-T-Ten.
Wuncler: (mocking her stuttering) T-T-T-Too damn old to be writing your "e's" 
backwards, damnit! (walks away, chuckles)
Wuncler: (speaking under his breath) Squirm little worm.
Jazmine: What happened?
Huey: It's okay Jazmine; you don't need him.
Jazmine: (angrily) What do you mean I don't need him?
Huey: Well you're not gonna let him treat you like that?
Jazmine: What, you think ponies grow on trees?
Huey: What kind of question is that? It's a large four-legged mammal.
Jazmine: Or maybe I'm just supposed to wait until I'm an old woman before I get 
my pony. How am I gonna look, Huey? A sixty-five year old woman riding a pony...
Huey: Jazmine, he's a crook...
Jazmine: You just want everyone to be miserable because you're miserable. AND 
WHY ARE YOU WEARING THAT STUPID COAT?.. wish you'd go away...
%
Granddad: (pondering) Let's see... I want a... umm...
(cut to female customer)
Female customer: (speaking quickly) I'll take two small lemonades with ice, two 
small lemonades without ice, three large lemonades — one with ice, one with 
no ice, one with crushed ice...
(cut back to Granddad)
Granddad: You guys have aaummmmmm... uh... hmmm...
(cut to Riley)
Riley: (slaps some change on the counter) That's all I got.
Jazmine: Lemonade is a dollar.
Riley: That's all I got! Make it work, I'm thirsty!
Jazmine: Lemonade is a dollar!
Riley: I ain't got no dollar! It's hot as hell out here, man, jus hook me up! 
All the money I spend up in this place? This some ol' bullshit!
Jazmine: Lemonade... is... a... DOLLAR!
(cut back to Granddad)
Granddad: Hmm... Do you guys have anything other than lemonade?
Jazmine: (stares annoyingly at him)
(cut to Huey)
Huey: Jazmine, this is stupid. You're bein' exploited.
Jazmine: You'll never get anywhere in this world without doing a fair day's 
work for a fair day's pay.
Huey: Jazmine, Ed's never gonna give you that pony!
Jazmine: Next!
(cut to Tom)
Tom: Peaches, I think it's time you come inside.
Jazmine: Can't talk, Dad, makin' lemonade.
Tom: Come on, honey, I want you inside now.
Annoyed customer one: I have been waiting twenty minutes for this lemonade.
Annoyed customer two: I'm thirsty!
Wuncler: (approaching Tom) What's the problem?
Tom: Mr. Wuncler, ya know, yesterday I thought this was cute, but, don't you 
think you guys are taking this a little far?
Wuncler: Jazmine can leave whenever she wants, but Sammy Davis, Jr. the Pony 
will have to be put down.
Jazmine: What?!
Wuncler: He's your pony now. Your percentage was supposed to pay for his food 
and upkeep. Now he'll starve to death in a puddle of his own feces.
Jazmine: (begins sobbing loudly)
Tom: (obligedly) Oh come on... Mr. Wuncler...
Jazmine: I don't wanna leave, Mr. Wuncler! Please, Daddy, don't make me leave!
Wuncler: (pulling Tom aside) There you have it. You know the name of the game; 
your daughter chose me. Now we can handle this like some gentlemen, or we can 
get into some old gangster shit.
Tom: (nervous, goes back to Jazmine) Okay, best of luck, honey! (he scurries 
away)
%
Huey: (narrating) Maybe the heat does make people crazy (child labor protesters 
and lemonade customers are fighting each other). Before you know it, crazy 
becomes normal (they continue rioting).
Huey: (later, narrating; clouds form, snow begins to fall) But, sanity 
eventually returned, and when it does, you better have your coat.
%
Ronald Reagan:(talking to Ruckus) White heaven is for decent, good, god fearing 
Christians who just happen to, well, hate everyone and everything relating to 
black people. That means no Muhammad Ali, no hip hop music, and no fucking 
Jesse Jackson.
Uncle Ruckus: What about Whoopi Goldberg?
Ronald Reagan: Nope
Uncle Ruckus: Oh, this is Heaven.
%
Ronald Reagan: Turns out that God really doesn’t have that much of a problem 
with racism. He doesn’t even remember slavery, except in February. 
Personally, I hate black people, Ruckus. That’s why I did everything I could 
to make their lives miserable. Crack? Me. AIDS? Me. Reaganomics? (chuckles) 
C'mon. I'm in the name.
%
(Doorbell rings, Granddad answers)
Uncle Ruckus: God bless you Robert. How are you this fine morning?
Robert: [Sees Ruckus holding a Bible] You not a Jehovah Witness now, are you? 
Cause I’m in the Jehovah Witness protection program.
Uncle Ruckus: (laughs) Robert, I’m dying. That’s right. Went to the doctor 
this morning. I only got six months to live... tumor on the back. They call it 
"bigus backus tumoritis," or some other big word that my tiny negro brain and 
big lips can’t pro-nounce. Doctors say they can’t operate, but praise be to 
white God and his son, white Jesus!
Robert: Well, I’m sorry to hear that, Ruckus. You’re not contagious, are 
you?
Uncle Ruckus: Just contagious with the Holy Spirit of our Caucasian savior. 
I’m on a mission from God.
%
Huey: At this point we’re resorting to what I call “desperation tactics.”
Shabazz: Such as?
Huey: (whispering) I’ve sent anonymous letters to the governor threatening to 
expose his gay lover.
Shabazz: I wasn’t aware the governor was gay…
Huey: He probably isn’t. But I figure ten percent of the population is gay, 
and probably about half of people cheat on their spouses; so I figure that plan 
has about a five percent chance of success. Better than nothing.
Shabazz: Huey…
Huey: What? You always say I should have faith. Well that’s me having faith. 
Random anonymous blackmail...
%
Riley: Why don't you just holla at him?
Inmate: Pshh, I don't know. He's so detached. We used to spend all our yard 
time together. We used to lift weights together every day. He doesn't even spot 
me anymore. I think there's somebody else.
Riley: ...Jail nigga, you gay.
%
Jazmine: Do you believe in God, Huey? I believe in God.
Riley: (interrupting) First of all, I'm gonna live forever, but if I do die I'm 
gonna smack God upside the head and go tell him to get me a grilled cheese 
sandwich and some tacos...
Jazmine: (to Huey) When I want something, or I'm afraid about something, I 
pray. Have you ever prayed?
Riley: (interrupting) ...And I dare God to say something. I be like, "Say 
somethin' God! Say somethin'! Yea I thought so..."
Jazmine: (to Huey) You should pray for Shabazz — God'll get him out of jail. 
They have to listen to Him... He's God.
Riley: (continuing)...And if God say somethin' I be like this. (he makes 
punching motions) Take that God. (Huey shakes his head) I be beatin' God's jaw 
like blikaa, blaa.
%
Huey: But granddad you promised to take me to the prison tonight…
Granddad: Not tonight – somebody has to talk some sense into Ruckus.
Huey: But I’m tryin’ to save my friend!
Granddad: Me, too.
Huey: But I promised him! I gave him my word I’d be there!
Granddad: He’s gonna die, and there’s nothin’ you can do about it.
[Heu looks dejected. Granddad kneels, sighs, and touches Huey’s shoulder)
Granddad: You should pray for your friend, Huey. That’s all anyone can do f...
Ruckus: (on the television, interrupting) Martin Luther King and all the 
colored folks that died before (he continues talking)
Huey: What makes your god any less made up than his?
%
Huey: (later) Operation Black Steel — the mission to liberate Shabazz K. 
Milton Berle — was aborted... 'cause I couldn't get a ride.
%
Huey: (praying in his head, on his knees, in tears) I never prayed before. I 
don’t even know who I'm prayin’ to. Maybe I'm too young to know what the 
world is supposed to be. But it’s not supposed to be this. It can’t be 
this. So... please.
%
(Cut to the governor's office)
Man: Governor!
Governor: What is it?
Man: They found out about Raoul!
%
(Cut to Uncle Ruckus's revival)
Uncle Ruckus: Now let us pray. Lord, I have spent my whole life hatin’ you 
for makin’ me black. And now I see I must hate myself and all those like me, 
and cause them misery just like your savior Ronald Reagan did. And if any of my 
words don’t come directly from the almighty God himself, then may I be struck 
by lightnin’ right this very instant! Halle... ahhhhhhhh! (he’s struck by 
lightning, which causes a city-wide power outage)
%
(Cut to Shabazz in the execution chamber. The power goes out right as the 
switch is pulled, and comes back on moments later. A phone rings)
Prison guard: What just happened?
Shabazz: Would somebody like to get that? I think it’s for me.
%
Huey: (narrating) The lightning bolt that saved Shabazz’s life seemed to have 
struck Uncle Ruckus on his tumor. Doctors would find no remaining signs of his 
cancer. Some called it a miracle. (pauses) And maybe there are forces in this 
universe we don’t understand. But I still believe we make our own miracles.
%
Huey: (later, narrating) Shabazz K. Milton Berle was not yet free, but for now, 
the mission had been accomplished. I decided to take the rest of the day off... 
I wonder if there's anything good on TV.
%
[Granddad looks at the menu and sees the extremely high prices for snacks.]
Granddad: Damn!
[He looks at the Receptionist.]
Granddad: Large, freshly-popped popcorn, please, and lots of butter.
[The receptionist gives him his popcorn.]
Receptionist: (uninterestedly) Anything else?
Granddad: I asked for butter on it.
Receptionist: Butter's over there.
[Cut to a very poorly maintained condiment station.]
Granddad: I don't wanna put the butter on it. Why can't you do it?
Receptionist: You're supposed to put the butter on it.
Granddad: I don't wanna put the butter on it! I already paid twenty dollars for 
this bullshit popcorn. I will not demean myself by putting butter on popcorn!
Receptionist: (still monotone) Why? It's really easy.
Granddad: Why? Because I don't work at the movie theater! That's why!
Receptionist: You're supposed to put the butter on it.
Granddad: ...If I go to Burger King, and order a cheeseburger, THEY DON'T MAKE 
ME PUT THE CHEESE ON IT, DO THEY GODDAMMIT!?
%
Huey: (to Jasmine about going to the movies with Grandad) This will be the 
worst day of your life. I'm bringin' nunchucks.
Riley:...I'm bringin' the .308 notecards!
%
Granddad (singing): Soul Plane! Soul Pla-a-a-ane! We gonna fly on the 
Sooooooooooouuuuuuuuuuul Plane.
%
(From the Soul Plane 2 Trailer)
Terrorist: (brandishing a box cutter) This is a hijacking! Remain in your seats 
-- we have a bomb on the aircraft! Everyone remain--
(Several hulking black men swarm him and give him a savage beatdown)
(the terrorist's accomplices watch on horrified, and cower behind their 
newpapers)
%
Mo'nique: Damn! Now are you yelling at me or shitting at me?!
%
Snoop Dogg: (As pilot of the Soul Plane) Hijack? Them niggas ain't gettin my 
wizeed fo' rizeal fo' shizzle ma nigga, you know what I'm sayin'?
%
Snoop Dogg: (As pilot of the Soul Plane, speaking on radio) The terrorist's 
name is Kareem Abdul Jabaar... Naw nigga, I ain't gonna ask him for his 
mu'fuckin autograph!
%
(Huey starts to sit in the theatre seat next to Riley)
Riley: (edging away in his seat) Eww, nigga you gay!
(Riley moves to the next seat)
%
Riley: Booooo! Ay, Cuttotheflick!
%
(leaving Huey and Jazmine at the movie theater after watching Soul Plane 2)
Riley: Heh, heh. That was great, Granddad. Boy I wish we could've seen the end 
of that movie.
Granddad: I don't know. I feel bad for leaving Huey and what's-her-name.
Riley: They knew the risks, so they might do a little time. We'll see them when 
they get out.
Granddad: Ahhh, it doesn't seem right. I'm going back and turning myself in.
Riley: Turn yourself?--man--Granddad, look, come on. I mean, I love Huey. 
almost like a brother, but what's done is done. We've got to let go of the 
past! If he don't come back, can I have his side of the room?
(Granddad walks away)
Riley:Ah, come on, Granddad! You supposed to be setting a better example!
%
Air Marshall 50 Cent (loads gun) Sometimes, in order to save the day, people 
have to sacrifice themselves, yaknowwhat i'm sayin?
Monique Oh, Air Marshall 50 Cent, you're so brave to sacrifice yourself to save 
us! (starts to cry)
Air Marshall 50 Cent Not me, bitch! You! (uses Monique as human shield)
%
Air Marshall 50 Cent: I'll stop these terrorists... or die tryin'...
%
Air Marshall 50 Cent: I'm gonna put an end to this... or die tryin'...
%
Terrorist: You will not kill me, Air Marshall 50 Cent! You will only die trying!
Air Marshall 50 Cent: But I will kill you. Or I'm... uh... I'm gonna die... 
uh... trying...
%
Granddad: What happened to the movie theatre? Y'all should be ashamed! How come 
when I order a soda-pop, I get an empty cup? I didn't ask for an empty cup! I 
asked for a soda-pop! And what asshole started puttin' commercials in movies? I 
could go home and watch commercials on the TV! And the bathroom stinks; clean 
the fuckin' bathroom! I'm not gonna take it anymore! I paid too much money for 
these movie tickets to butter my own motherfuckin' popcorn! It's only popcorn!
[Granddad screams loud enough so that the whole movie theatre can hear him.]
Ruckus: When'd you get here?
Granddad: ...Huh?
Ruckus: Well, I've been standin' at the ticket window all day, and I don't 
remember you buyin' a ticket, Robert Freeman.
Granddad: Well, I...uh, bought my tickets online...
Ruckus: AHA! A damn lie! I ain't never met a nigga smart enough to operate a 
personal computer! Not even a Macintosh!
%
(After Huey dispatches some theater security with a impromptu bo-staff)
Uncle Ruckus: I've been waiting on this day ever since your uppity ass came 
into town. What what? You thought you were the only one who mastered the 
ancient and deadly art of the nunchaku?
[the episode ends with Huey and Uncle Ruckus kicking in mid-air]
%
A Pimp Named Slickback: Tom, I hope you can appreciate our 'No Refunds' policy. 
How about a complimentary date with Sweetest Taboo?
%
(After Tom re-enacts Usher's Burn)
Riley: BOOOOOOOOOOOOO!!!! Hey Tom, Shut the fuck up!
Granddad: Boy watch your mouth! Tom, shut the fuck up!
%
Riley: Usher??!! (laughs) That nigga's my age!
%
Riley: (smiling wickedly while playing video games) I say toss her groupie ass 
out the window and let that hoe star gaze from outside.
Tom: Now Riley, There's never a place for violence in a relationship.
Riley: (laughing) There just seemed to be a place at the restaurant last night! 
She made you look like a bitch in front of Usher!
Granddad: Boy, hush your mouth!
Uncle Ruckus: (To the side) Probably started out charitable. She took you in 
and was probably teaching you how to read.
Riley: But granddad, she did made Mr.Dubois look like a bitch.
Granddad: Yeah, we all know she made him look a bitch. But find a different way 
to say it.
Uncle Ruckus: Next thing you know you're rubbing against that silky white 
skin...
Riley: But I don't know the non-curse way to say he got "bitched"!
Huey: Humiliated, Castrated, Emasculated...
Tom: All right!!! I get the point.
Riley: I mean, I can see if was a real nigga. If you lost your hoe to T.I. I'd 
be like "Yo, that's T.I." But Usher?! (laughs) You better check that ho Mr. 
Dubois!
%
Huey: Could be worse. Could've been Omarion.
%
Tom: And so sweetie, that's why daddy's staying over at the Freeman's house. So 
mommy can have her space.
Jazmine: So you're not getting a divorce?
Tom: What?, Oh, no sweetie.
Jazmine: So Usher won't be my new daddy?
Tom: What? No, that's ridiculous.
Jazmine: Oh, are you sure? May'be just for a little while? I mean, you like it 
here don't you daddy? This is uh....pretty good sized room.
%
Riley: (to Tom) So this is the message you wanna send to the young youth out 
here like myself that's trying to do the right thing and not love these ho's, 
huh? Wha...wha...what's all this? Is this what's hot right now in the streets? 
That's what's really hood, huh? Off from some white girl that left you for some 
R&B dancin' ass, sexy flexy ass nigga?
%
Granddad: Hey Tom? Tom? Get down here.
Tom: (walks into living room) Uh, what's going on guys?
A Pimp Named Slickback: Uh, Mr. Dubois, My name is A Pimp Named Slickback, and 
this sir, is an intervention.
Tom: An intervention?
A Pimp Named Slickback: Your friends have reason to believe that you are 
suffering from chronic Bitch Dependency Mr. Dubois. May I call you Tom?
Tom: (looks around room) Is this some kind of joke?
A Pimp Named Slickback: Tom, Bitch Dependency is no laughing matter. Addiction 
to a bitch can fuck with your friends, your health, and scary enough, even you 
money. It's a disease Tom.
Tom: Wait, what did you say your name was, again?
A Pimp named Slickback: Well thank you for asking, my name is A Pimp Named 
Slickback.
Tom: Wait, A Pimp--?
A Pimp named Slickback: (interrupting) --Named Slickback, yes. Please say the 
whole thing, if you would. Yes, that includes the "A Pimp Named" part. Yes, 
Tom, every time.
Tom: Look Mr. A Pimp Named Slickback--
A Pimp named Slickback: (interrupting again) --No need for the "Mister".
Tom: I-I don't think I need any help from (scoffs) someone like you.
A Pimp named Slickback: And by (scoffs) 'someone like me', you mean a pimp, a 
bad guy?
Tom: Now look, I'm not trying to insult you, I just don't approve of what you 
people do to women.
A Pimp named Slickback: (jeering) Ooooh! So I'm wrong! So I'm messed up! We'll 
which one of us is the one missing a bitch, Tom? You don't see me running 
around lookin' for a bitch! I know where all of my bitches are, thank you very 
much! (dials number) Bitch where you at?! (ho speaks) I'm out here, gettin' yo 
money! (Slickback retorts) That's what the hell I thought, thank you grandma! 
(to Tom) Now look at you! Bitchless! Sans bitch, as the French in France would 
say!
Tom: (visibly annoyed) I've had enough! I'm going back upstairs!
Granddad: Tom! Tom, when we first let you stay here, we thought it was only 
gonna be temporary. But damn! Tom, I just don't see any end in sight!
Tom: It's only been two days--.
Granddad: (interrupting) --Nigga, hush! You're living under my roof now. If you 
stay here, you're going to get some help.
Tom: You know what? I know a great therapist. I'll make an appointment today!
Granddad: (slowly)That, also would have been a good idea but, we've already 
paid Mr. A Pimp named Slickback a retainer of 2,500 dollars.
Tom: Robert, you shouldn't have.
Granddad: With your credit card!
Tom: Oh.
%
A Pimp Named Slickback: Did you know that scientists now believe that some 
people are actually born with the genetic predisposition to Bitch Dependency?
Tom: And exactly, when did you become a relationship counselor?
A Pimp Named Slickback: Well, sharing this pimp knowledge for an exorbitent fee 
is my way of giving back something back to the community Tom. I wanna help you 
Tom, I do. But I need you to help me, help you.
Tom: Hmm. (to himself) Hmm. Help me, help you. Ya. Ok.
A Pimp Named Slickback: Now, tell me if you would about this bitch you have an 
unhealthy dependency on.
Tom: Could we please not call her a b-b-bitch.
A Pimp Named Slickback: Say it. Bitch. Yeh, Yes! We gotta call her that Tom! 
I'm sorry. After what she's done, not calling her a bitch would be 
disrespectful to you, and I'm not able to do that. Now please continue.
Tom: Well, My wife, Sarah. I mean, she's the best woman in the world. We've had 
a great life together until now. (Blue Eyes by Elton John starts to play in 
background as a slideshow of Tom and Sarah is played with Tom looking amused 
and Sarah looking bored)
A Pimp Named Slickback: It sounds to me, Tom, like some of the passion has gone 
out of your marriage and perhaps you're not providing enough excitement for 
her. It's a normal thing in long-term relationships.
Tom: And you can help me fix it?
A Pimp Named Slickback: Hell nah! I'm gonna help make that bitch behave! She 
want's excitement she can take her ass to the movies!
%
A Pimp Named Slickback: Did you know that a least 75% of bitches suffer from 
some kind of hearing loss? This alarming statistic means that more likely than 
not, talking isn't the most effective way to communicate with a bitch. That's 
when you have to hit her.
Tom: Whoa, What?
A Pimp named Slickback: You tell her what you want her to do. If she say no, 
hit the bitch! Simple.
Tom: (verbally stubling) But I, I couldn't hit Sarah. I couldn't hit any woman!
A Pimp named Slickback: Has not hitting a bitch been working? I mean, 
scientifically speaking, has not hitting a bitch achieved the desired results?
Tom: No way. (verbally stumbling) I just, I-I-I can't, I-cou-I couldn't. I 
won't!
A Pimp named Slickback: Tom? Tom, Take a deep breath. It's Ok. People have 
phobias. Some niggas can't cross bridges, you can't go upside a bitch's head. 
Ok. We can beat this.
%
A Pimp named Slickback: Tom, this is my bottom bitch, Sweetest Taboo. Now, 
she's gonna help you learn how to reestablish dominance at home.
Tom: Mm, hello.
A Pimp named Slickback: Taboo will be playing the role of your wife. Now, 
approach Taboo, grab her arm firmly, and command her to leave with you.
Tom: Ok. Sarah! Get your behind--
A Pimp named Slickback: (interrupting) --Stop! Stop! say bitch.
Tom: Do i have to call her a bitch? Really?
A Pimp named Slickback: Yes Tom. You have to call her a bitch. Trust me on this 
one, I've done the research. Now try again.
Tom: Bitch! Get you behind--
A Pimp named Slickback: (interrupting once more) Ass!
Tom: (to Sweetest Taboo) Bitch, get your ass in the car!
Sweetest Taboo: Kiss my ass, you little dick faggot muthafucka! If you was any 
kind of real man, I wouldn't be here with Usher in the first place!
Tom: Wait, hold on. I-I-I don't think that's what Sarah would say.
A Pimp Named Slickback: It's now tragically obvious that reasoning with the 
bitch is not gon' work Tom. You have to hit her.
Tom: I'm an Assistant District Attorney for Christ's sake!
A Pimp Named Slickback: Tom, you have to get past this.
Sweetest Taboo: It's okay, faggot! Really!
A Pimp Named Slickback: See, faggot? She just gave you permission.
[Sweetest Taboo starts hitting Tom]
Tom: Ow! My chin!
A Pimp Named Slickback: See that, bitch has no problem hitting you.
[Sweetest Taboo continues to beat Tom up]
A Pimp Named Slickback: [Observing as Tom tries and fails to fend off Sweetest 
Taboo] You are definitely allowed by law to hit her now Tom, it's self defense. 
Sweetest Taboo, you are in rare form.
%
A Pimp named Slickback: This is my state-of-the-art surveillance center.
Tom: Why does a pimp need a surveillance center?
A Pimp named Slickback: Included in your retainer fee is state-of-the-art bitch 
surveillance. Quiet storm here has been monitoring your wife's conversations 
and e-mails.
Quiet Storm: Daddy, I've got transcripts Of all her conversations today. No 
mention of Usher. I'm hacking into her e-mail now, but this computer is running 
a bit slow. Perhaps if we didn't have dial-up...
A Pimp named Slickback: (picks up "Mac Now" magazine and smacks Quiet Storm 
across her head with it) Bitch, don't start with that 'we need another 
computer' shit again! You say that shit every time a new i-Mac comes out. You 
ain't slick! You better make that G4 work, bitch, and stop playin' with me!
Quiet Storm: (nonchalantly) Yes Daddy. Nothing in the e-mail. Does she have a 
Myspace page?
Tom: Myspace? (laughs) I don't think Sarah would have a--
Quiet Storm: Found it.
Tom: (to himself) Hmm. Since when did she have a MySpace page?
Quiet Storm: You know what her password might be?
Tom:Uh, Gosh golly. We usually use each others middle names as passwords so, 
mine would be "Lancaster" That's L-A-N--
Quiet Storm: Got it. Password is "Usher". Here we go. Message to Usher: Looks 
like they're getting together at 3 o'clock at the Woodcrest Chateau Hotel.
Tom: That's in an hour! We have to go! You have to take me!
A Pimp named Slickback: Tom, if you not ready to take control, then going there 
won't help. I say, let the bitch go.
Tom: I paid you 2000 dollars... and 500 dollars as well!
A Pimp named Slickback: Now Tom, I hope you can appreciate our no-refunds 
policy. How 'bout a complimentary date with Sweetest Taboo?
Tom: No, no, no! You're still on retainer, and were going NOW!
A Pimp named Slickback: Ooooohhhh! Now the nigga can get some bass in his voice!
Tom: Yeah, bitch! Let's go!
%
Tom: There they are. (takes deep breath)
A Pimp Named Slickback: Remember to hit the bitch!
Tom: Sarah! I mean, bitch! Get yo ass in the car!
Sarah: Excuse me Dolemyte!
Tom: You heard me, biatch!
Sarah: Tom, please calm down and let me go!
Usher: Hey look, man, I think you should calm down.
Tom: (clenches fist as if about to hit Sarah but in stead hits Usher and says,) 
You can't have my wife!
Sarah: Tom!
Jazmine: Uh! Daddy! What did you do to Usheerrrrrr?
Tom: Jazmine?
Jazmine: Daddy! Leave Usher alone! What are you doing? Why are you trying to 
kill Usher?!
Sarah: Yes, Sugarfly, Jazmine wanted to meet Usher.
Jazmine: You're an animal! Is Usher Ok?!
Tom: So you're not--
Sarah: No!
%
(Usher proceeds to knock him to the ground)
Sarah: Wait! Stop! Don't hurt him!
Jazmine: I'm sorry Usherrrrrrr!
%
Ed Wuncler III: Yo.
Gin Rummy: What up?
Ed Wuncler III: Yo, can you hear me?
Gin Rummy: Yeah, I see you too. Whatcha want, Nigga?
Ed Wuncler III: Aw man, same shit. What's up with you?
Gin Rummy: Da fuck you mean "what's up with me"? I'm sitting right here next to 
you.
Ed Wuncler III: Voice sound real sexy right now...
Gin Rummy: Say what?!
Ed Wuncler III: You wanna talk to me later on?
Gin Rummy: No, I don't wanna talk later on motherfucker! WHAT DA FUCK IS WRONG 
WIT YOU?! WHAT DA FUCK'S SO SEXY ABOUT MY VOICE?!
Ed Wuncler III: (Reveals the bluetooth on his left ear) Ah man, my bad, I was 
on the phone.
Gin Rummy: Great, you got one of those ridiculous fucking headset.
%
Ed Wuncler III: Okay, now last week I was in the strip club, right? I had 
titties in one hand, titties in the other hand, I had two hands full of 
titties. That's bigger than two scoops of raisins; I'm still talking to my 
accountant at the same time. What's not to like about that?!!
Gin Rummy: Okay, first of all, I don't know when you talkin' to me, or when you 
talkin' on the god damn phone. Second, when people wear those thing, they 
appear to be talkin' to theirselves, there's a name for people who talk to 
theirselves, Ed... they're called the homeless!
%
Ed Wuncler III: Man, bitches love this bluetooth shit, it changed my life! I 
don't know what to do with my hands now!
Gin Rummy: Be that as it may, no technology is worth my dignity. If talking on 
a wireless headset means I gotta look like Buck Rogers, then I'm not 
interested. Besides, there's a reason why people hold a phone to their head, 
Ed; it lets people around you know your talking on the phone. So those people 
know not to waste time talking to ya until you finish, which you indicate, by 
putting that mothafucka away!
%
Ed Wuncler III: (into his Bluetooth while Gin Rummy is bending over to look 
under the bed) "You know I like the way your booty looks when you bend over; I 
like that a lot. Very sexy. Mm-hmm, I can make it over there later... yeah I'm 
real ready."
Gin Rummy: "I hate that fucking headset!"
%
Gangstalicious: (dancing with a bottle of Hennesey and a tennis racket) "Uh! 
Uh! Drop da beat! Drop da beat! Uh! Gangstalicious! / My mind's too vicious! / 
Eat MCs all day, mmm, delicious! / My whole crew up in dis / No doubt we gonna 
win dis / Smack up yo moms like I smacked Johnny Ginnis / 3 o clock yesterday / 
I don't care what dey say / Sucker really shouldn't play / I hit dem wit da 
Henne-saaaay!"
%
Grandad: (to Riley) I'm gonna take me a nap, gonna drink me a Red Bull, then 
I'm wake up and beat you until you decide to talk!
%
Ed Wuncler III: You see, I'm what they call tecno-savvy. I fucks wit da future
Gin Rummy: Yeah, the problem is we don't live in the future, Ed, we live in the 
present, and in the present that shit looks ridiculous. It's not a cybernetic 
ear, it's a fucking cell phone headset. The only thing you gonna do wit da 
thing is call a bitch and unless the bitch is a Martian, there ain't no 
explanation for that shit to look that damn high-tech. Have you seen that shit 
in the mirror? You look like you're going to a fucking comic book convention!
%
Ed Wuncler III: (to the assembled crowd) What the fuck y'all lookin' at? (into 
his Bluetooth) No baby, I wasn't talking to you...
%
Gin Rummy: (to Riley as he and Ed rode of on his bike) Thank you for not 
snitching!
Ed Wuncler III: You stupid mother fucka!
%
(Ed and Rummy laugh while Riley looks like he's bound to cry)
Ruckus: It was them Freeman boys! I'm tellin' you you can't trust those new 
niggas!
%
(Everybody Gasps)
Ruckus: (modestly) Yeah I said it...
%
Riley: But what will my niggas think of me if i snitched?
Huey: What niggas?
Riley: I got niggas!!!
Huey: Where?
Riley: In da street!!!
Huey: What street?
%
Interrogator: Now you listen here you little bitch. I'm gonna ask you some real 
simple questions and I want some real simple answers. Now you pulled into the 
garage and went into the house at 9.15?
Granddad: Yes, I believe, if I'm not mistaken. It was 9.15!
Interrogator: So you pulled into the garage and went into the house at 9.15?
Granddad: Ye-N..Nine. Yes, I looked at my watch and yes. Unhuh unhuh, 9.15.
Interrogator: So you're telling me definitely that you pulled into the garage 
and went into the house at 8.15?
Granddad: Yyyyees. That's- I believe it was 8.15. Definitely.
Interrogator: Hmmmm Let me see. You know you just fucked up, right?
Granddad: No! I said... No! I said, I pulled into the garage at duh-
Interrogator: (laughing) You know you just fucked up, right!
Granddad: No! I said... Wait a minute!
%
The Devil: (Narrating) He was the baddest motherfucker that hell had ever 
seen...
Colonel Stinkmeaner: Colonel Motherfuckin' Stinkmeaner, holla at ya boy, I gets 
money!
The Devil: He trained like a beast...
Colonel Stinkmeaner: Ya'll gonna have to kick me out of this bitch! I'm having 
the TIME OF MY LIFE!
The Devil: He was so bad, he even called me, the Devil himself, a...
Colonel Stinkmeaner: BITCH ASS NIGGA!
Colonel Stinkmeaner: This is how you break your foot off in a motherfucker's 
ass! (He kicks through two flaming hoops and smashes two vases) Hi-yaaah!
(Several demons encircle Stinkmeaner)
Colonel Stinkmeaner: Oooh! You cold-hearted nigga monsters tryna swarm on a 
nigga, huh?!
(Stinkmeaner begins to beat the crap out of the demons.)
Colonel Stinkmeaner: You just got a two-piece combo with a biscuit, ho!
Colonel Stinkmeaner: I got three-stick nunchucks!! AAAAAAH!! Got ya, nigga! I 
see ya, I see ya!
%
The Devil: Stinkmeaner, your heart of darkness has earned you a trip back, you 
have my blessings to exact vengance on the Freeman family and to spread 
ignorance and chaos in the black community, they will be no match for you.
(The Devil places his hand on Stinkmeaner's forehead and blasts him back up to 
Earth.)
Colonel Stinkmeaner: Hell ain't shit! I'm gonna get you, Freeman!
%
Grandad: *After Huey helped him to get on Myspace* So she's on my friendslist?
Riley: Yep, she's your very first cyber friend, and your her 3,000,000th
Grandad: Yaaaa boy, I love technology!
Huey: (narrating) My granddad had recently discovered online dating
Riley: You should post more pics, ho's love pictures Grandad
Grandad: I'm starting to feel like Shamar Moore up in here, Hoo! Boy lets get 
some music on, turn on the Mypod lets get on the ISpace
(We then see clips of Grandpa taking pictures of himself in various poses)
Riley: What outfit you want next Grandad?
Grandad: The leather vest, the one with the rhinestones (Huey walks in)
Huey: Grandad, I.... (stopped because of the shock of seeing his grandad taking 
a picture of his butt) I can come back
Grandad: Boy, get over here and take this picture, now whats wrong with you? 
why the long face?
Huey: I had a bad dream about....
Grandad: Talk and shoot at the same time boy. (Riley walks in carrying two 
Michael Jackson jackets)
Riley: Grandad! you want "Beat It" or "Thriller"?
Grandad: Hmmmm, that's a tough one, take them back, go get my purple speedo
Riley: Purple speedo? that's gay
Grandad: Allright boy, so you had a bad dream
Huey: It was a really bad dream about...
Riley: (In the closet) I don't see the purple one
Granddad: Did you check the speedo drawer? Go ahead boy, bad dream and....?
Huey: It was about Stinkmeaner (Riley returns with a leopard-print speedo)
Riley: Leopard-print's all I could find
Granddad: Aww man (changes underwear in front of Huey and Riley, who runs out 
of the room throwing up) damn these things are tight, what about Stinkmeaner?
Huey: He was in hell, and he was coming back to get us
Granddad: Stinkmeaner? don't be crazy
Riley: Stinkmeaner? you mean that old man Granddad killed for no reason?
Granddad: No reason? that man was a psycho, he almost killed your grandaddy
Riley: He was blind, you killed a blind old man
Granddad: Col. Stinkmeaner was a menace, and i sent him to hell where he belongs
Riley: (Chuckles) Yeah, Grandad real tough with the handicap, he probably gonna 
beat up some retarded kids next.
Granddad: Yeah, this retarded man is gone whoop your little ass that's what 
he's gonna do... wait...you know what I meant..what were we talkin about? Ohh 
yeah your dream, look boy, Stinkmeaner aint comin back, he cant hurt you, me, 
or any of us ok...now lets get one more picture.
%
Huey: (Narrating) Some people are scared of zombies and vampires. But the thing 
that scare black people the most, are niggas and nigga moments. Tom DuBois was 
as far from a nigga as a black man could be. But Stinkmeaner knew that every 
black man's spirit is weakened during a nigga moment.
(Tom waits patiently for a car to pull out of a parking spot. Before he can 
pull in, a Benz whips into the spot ahead of him.)
Tom Dubois: What the...? Oh, come on, you... you... ni...nincompoop! You can't 
do that! Hey!! Come on!
Huey: (Narrating) Nigga moments can happen to ANY black man at ANY time.
(The young black man gets out of the car, pointedly ignoring Tom. Tom gets out 
and follows him)
Tom Dubois: Hey!! That was my space! I had my blinker on and everything!
Young Black Man: Fuck you, punk-ass, pussy-ass hook-ass, nigga! (Tom flinches) 
I'll beat your motherfuckin' sadiddy ass, nigga! Don't never in yo' LIFE ever 
try to holla at me nigga! (starts to walk away) Fuck with me, nigga, and I'll 
pop da trunk on yo' bitch ass, nigga, get my motherfuckin' Uzi, nigga.
(Tom seethes, and starts to convulse as Stinkmeaner's spirit possesses him. 
Tom's face contorts evilly)
Possessed Tom: WHAT DID YOU SAY, NIGGA??
(Young black man stops in his tracks, turns around and walks back towards Tom)
Young Black Man: (annoyed) You know what, motherfucker? Eat a dick, nigga. I'm 
tired of this motherf--
(Possessed Tom jumps in the air and kicks the young black man squarely in the 
chest with both feet. The force sends the young black man flying through the 
air and lands hard on the concrete)
Possessed Tom: (in a maniacal froth, the young black man cowers in fear) OH 
YEAH! Look at you! You was poppin' all that GOOD SHIT a second ago and then you 
got KICKED IN YO' CHEST! YOU EAT A DICK NIGGA, YOU EAT A DICK!
(Tom's face reverses to his regular self, along with his persona)
Tom Dubois: Oh, my god! Sir, are you ok? Who did this to you? What did he look 
like? DID ANYONE SEE WHO ACCOSTED THIS MAN?
%
Grandad: (While looking at his myspace page) I got a date? I can't believe it!
Riley: Of course you got a date, Grandad! Everything on your page is a lie!
Grandad: NO IT IS NOT!
Riley: Grandad you don't skydive, you not Brazilian, and you never was a member 
of G-Unit-
Grandad: Mind your damn business!
Riley: -And she probably a man!
Grandad: SHUT UP!
%
Ms. Juan's Lawyer: So, Ms. Juan, there you were NOT carjacking Mr. Tyson 
Mintley, beating him senseless with a nine-iron, stealing his wallet--
Ms. Juan: Grab your wallet, bitch!
Ms. Juan's Lawyer: -- And driving his car into the laundry section of the 
JCPenney.
Ms. Juan: Correct. (Ms. Juan gives a wink to her lawyer.)
Ms. Juan's Lawyer: I have no further questions.
Tom: Now Ms. Juan, lemme ask you a question. (Begins convulsing as 
Stinkmeaner's ghost begins to take possession.)
Possessed Tom: Wus good NYUKAAA?!
(Audience gasp in shock)
Tom: Gaaaah! (Covering his mouth with his hand) Oh my god!
Judge: (glaring) Excuse me Mr. Dubois?
Tom: (chuckles nervously) I said um-- (Stinkmeaner gains posession once again)
Possessed Tom: Wus really good?!
(Audience laughs at Tom's retort)
Judge: (glaring) Is there something 'really good' you'd like to share with the 
court Mr. Dubois?
Possessed Tom: FUCK YOUR COURT, NIGGAH!
(Courtroom gasps)
Judge: Mr. Dubois!
Possessed Tom: (jumping up and down on table) FUCK..YOUR..COURT..NYUKKAH!!!
(lays on back, kicking the table) FUCK..YOUR..COURT!
(Tom covers his mouth and runs out of the courtroom)
Possessed Tom: Lady Liberty's got balls!
(Tom runs in a panic to the nearest bathroom. he gasps in panic, looks at 
himself in the mirror, only to see Stinkmeaner's face.)
Colonel Stinkmeaner: What's good, NIGGAAA?!
(Tom screams in horror and runs out of the bathroom.)
%
Huey: meanwhile, I couldn't shake the feeling that an evil force was gathering. 
(Huey then sees brief flashes of Stinkmeaner training in hell, and being sent 
back to Earth.) I must be crazy.
Ghostface Killah: (Ghostface Killah's apparent Force Ghost appears to Huey) 
Nah, you ain't crazy. Stinkmeaner's comin' back.
Huey: But Stinkmeaner died.
Ghostface Killah: What you gonna tell me, ghosts don't exist? Then what the 
fuck do I look like to you?
Huey: Ghostface Killah isn't even dead.
Ghostface Killah: Now, you say what you want, that old crazy goofy-lookin' 
mothafucka's comin' back. Your granddad's nigga moment ain't dead yet.
Huey: Then what am I supposed to do? If death can't stop Stinkmeaner, what can?
Ghostface Killah: Think about it. Peace. (Ghostface Killah's Force Ghost then 
leaves Huey.)
Grandad: (humming)
Huey: Look, granddad I'm really worried about Tom.
Grandad: Watch it boy, don't step on my roses!
Huey: Then why are you putting them on the floor...? But, anyway, I know this 
is gonna sound crazy, but I really think Stinkmeaner is...
Grandad: Oh hush boy, I ain't got time for that, now it's DATE NIGHT and you 
know the rules, now you get in that room I don't care if u hear a scream and 
hear the house shake like an earthquake, YOU DON'T LEAVE...! Now get!
%
Tom: Honey, I'm home.
Sara: Hey honey!
(Tom's face turns menacing, as he's possessed by Stinkmeaner)
Possessed Tom: OH YEAH!.. I think I wanna have sexual relations!
Sara: Tom, what's gotten into you?
Possessed Tom: Same thing that's about to get into you!
[Later, upstairs showing their bedroom window outside]
Sara: Oh, Tom!
Possessed Tom: Oh Yeah!!! Imma make it do what it do!
%
Granddad: (typing)Well, I'm in the studio with Snoop Doggy Dogg and Tha Pound 
tonight but how 'bout tomorrow cutie pie?
(Possessed Tom chopping a hole in the bathroom door)
Granddad: Aaah! What the! Who's out there! Boys! Boys! Help me!
Possessed Tom: III'M BAAAACK!! NYUGGAA! HAHAHAHAHA!
Granddad: OH LORDI LORD, GOOD LORDI LORD!
Granddad: TOM! What the hell is wrong with you!? Tom! Oh lordi lord! What the 
hell! Tom! Whats going on? Tom! Go away! I'm gonna call the police!
Possessed Tom: I'm gone get that old ass!
(In Huey and Riley's bedroom)
Huey: Did you hear that?
Riley: Man I can't hear nothin over granddad's gay ass music, look out, new 
message aww man its a old dude with his shirt off wait! That's granddad ewww, 
he in the bathroom, probably just ran out of toilet paper again and I ain't 
gettin it for him neither, nope.
Huey: Why would he send a message from...
Riley: Hey
Granddad: WHAT THE HELL! Tom! hats goin on! ohK my goodness! Tom! Whats goin 
here!? Oh help me son! Help me!
Huey: C'mon
(Granddad narrowly escaping from Possessed Tom while stumbling in his underwear 
and falling down the stairs before being almost sliced by Tom's axe)
Granddad: Oh my goodness! He's practically crazy! Goodness gracious! The life! 
Tom, what's wrong with you? You on that stuff? Snap out of it Tom, cocaine is a 
hell of a drug!
%
Possessed Tom: You don't remember ME? You don't remember my name?! (He then 
proceeds to punch Granddad in the face.)
Possessed Tom: What's my name, nyugga? (Tom does a low spin kick to Granddad's 
face.)
Granddad: AAAAH!
Possessed Tom: "AAAAH" ain't my name. My mama didn't name me "AAAAH". What's my 
name, nyugga?! WHAT'S MY NAME?!
Huey: Stinkmeaner!
Possessed Tom: DING-DING-DING-DING! THAT'S RIGHT, NYUGGA!
Riley: Mr. Dubois...?
Huey: I don't know how you got here, Stinkmeaner, but you're going back to Hell!
Possessed Tom: Oh yeah! I'm going back! And I'm takin' ya'll with me in the 
first-class cabin on the Ass-Whoopin' Express! All aboard! WHOO WHOO!
%
Possessed Tom: You ain't too little to get that ass whooped! bring it on Huey
%
(fighting)
Possessed Tom: Robert Freeman! You a bitch nigga! Where are you Robert? Come 
here and fight like a man, you fat-ass nigga!
Granddad's Date: Who's that?
Granddad: Uh, nothing!
Possessed Tom: (muffled) I know you can hear me, Robert! I know you hear me! I 
will not be ignored! I'm not a bitch!
Riley: Ain't this a bitch? Got a possessed nigga up here, and Granddad's 
worried about his date!
Possessed Tom: (breaks free from the handcuff on his right arm) Ah-hah! Get off 
me! You've got a date Robert? Did you tell her you have two sets of genitals! A 
vagina and a coochie! Oh, that's a conjunction! A vagina and a coochie!
Granddad's Date: What is going on?
Granddad: Oh, th-that? that's just the television. Eh, boys, turn the 
television down!
Possessed Tom: This ain't no TV show, nigga! This is real talk, nigga!
Granddad's Date: Uhh! My friends warned me that there were weirdoes on MySpace!
Granddad: Wait! No! That's just the TV!
Granddad's Date: It's not the fact that you obviously have a man possessed by 
an evil spirit, strapped to a bed upstairs!
Granddad: It's not?
Granddad's Date: No. It's the fact that you lied about it!
%
Possessed Tom: Is that all you got, nigga?
Uncle Ruckus: Oh, no, nigga. That's just the tip of this iceberg. (Opens a book 
and shoves it in Possessed Tom's face) Read, nigga, read!!!
Possessed Tom: AAAAAAAAGGGGHHHHH!!!(bed begins to levitate)
%
Riley, Grandad and Ruckas: Nigga! Get yo black ass out of there!
%
Uncle Ruckus: We must use the tools God gave us to fight niggas; a whip, a 
noose,a night-stick,a branding iron! These things strike fear into a nigga's 
heart. A job application!
%
Tom: (reviving) Uh-uh- w-what am I doing on Riley's bed?
Riley: You know, that's a real good question! What are you doing in my bed?! 
All the beds in this house and I got the possessed nigga in my bed! Ain't this 
a bitch! Some ol' bullshit!
%
Thugnificent: [gesturing to his hometown], "Now, this right here, is where I 
grew up. I seen everything, man, everything. I seen a nigga get killed right 
over there, you know? They beat him up, stomped him, shot the dude, stomped the 
nigga again, and then I seen 'em take a dump on the dude. I swear to god, man, 
they actually, like, shot a deuce on this nigga, man! They shat on a nigga, 
man! And I started thinking to myself; 'Man...what'd he do to make them niggas 
that mad?'.
(Looking at Thugnificent's extravagant mansion)
Uncle Ruckus: Looks like someone threw a million dollars into the monkey cage 
at the zoo...
%
Huey: You could invite them over for dinner and get to know them...
Granddad: Yeah, I... guess I could do that...
(Dream sequence)
(The Freemans are sitting, dressed up, at a candle-lit sunday dinner. Suddenly, 
the door bursts open and Lethal Interjection barges in.)
Macktastic: Wazhappenin' nigga? Alright nigga, where da chicken wings and 
donuts at?!
Thugnificent: (kicks over a chair, yelling) What the f**k you got to EAT in 
this bitch, NIGGA?!!!?!?
(Dream sequence ends)
Granddad: Uh-ummm! THAT shit ain't happenin'.
%
Thugnificent: (to Riley) Hey man, is this your brother?
Huey: Hello – goodbye
Thugnificent: Yo nigga, your brother told us how you be all into reading and 
shit. Hey that’s some real good shit my nigga, for real. Congratulations 
nigga.
Huey: Did you just congratulate me for reading?
Flonominal: Word, oh yeah, man, you know? Good shit, homie, word, yaknamean? Ya 
know that reading shit, yaknamean, it's hard, son! Word, yaknamean? Word, 
yaknamean, especially when them books be, yakneamn? You know, real thick and 
heavy like, yaknamean? Word, yaknamean?
%
Granddad: You don't know where I came from! I come from a town called 
Kick-A-Nappy-Country-Nigga's-Narrow-Ass, and ya'll makin' me homesick! There, 
now stick that up yo' ass!
(The next three lines are said at the same time.)
Thugnificent: Eat a dick, old man! You faggot-ass, punk-ass, pussy-ass nigga!
Macktastic: Eat it fool! Eat a dick, old muf**ka! Matter of fact, eat a sack of 
baby dicks, muthaf**ka!
Flonominal: F**k you, bitch-ass old man! No one likes you anyway, muf**ka!
%
EFF GRANDDAD
(chorus)
Nate Dogg: You just mad 'cos yo' ass is old (Macktastic: Old motherfucker!)/ 
First thing you do is just pick up the phone (Thugnificent: Eat a dick, 
nigga!)/ Lethal Interjection livin' next to your home / You motherfucking 
Grandpa / Old nigga it's on! (Thugnificent: Old motherfucker!)
(verse 1)
Thugnificent: Lethal Interjection versus one old nigga / He picked up the phone 
/ Now my finger's on the trigger / Snitchin' ain't the thing to do / So now me 
and my crew / Gonna show the block how to handle this fool! / He just hatin' 
'cos we went from rags to ritches / to baddest bitches / somebody need to ask 
these snitches / Why they talkin' to police? / No justice, no peace / My house 
is paid for / No rent, no lease!
(chorus) x 2
(verse 2)
Macktastic: This old man / He played fool / Now his ass is grass for dropping 
dimes on my crew / The only reason that I pack a strap / Is that I knew this 
old nigga was foul / Like Hack-a-Shaq!
(verse 3)
Flonominal: This is the type of heat / That when they start playin' it / Old 
folks should get their ass whupped / For acting all gay and sh--
Thugnificent: OLD ASS NIGGA!
Flonominal: You done crossed the line / See, it don't cost a dime / so now I 
toss my nine!
%
(Granddad and Thugnificent, apparently reconciling, shake hands and hug. The 
press applauds)
Granddad: (quietly, sourly) You still gonna pay for my lawn.
Thugnificent: (quietly, venomously) Eat a dick, old nigga.
%
(Granddad is awoken by the loud music at Thugnificent's house party)
Granddad: Hey!!! Shut up with all that damn noise!!!! I'm an old man, y'all 
need to listen to some Nat King Cole and some Johnny Mathis!!
%
Riley: (To Luna, who has just arrived) We don't keep cash in the house!
%
Luna: (About the Kumite, a martial arts tournament) Good times. Yeah, good 
times.
Huey: The Kumite (martial arts noise) is supposed to be death match, right?
Riley: You ever kill anybody?
Luna: Hey, everybody has to die sometime.
(Luna eats her meal, while a flashback continues again)
(In the flashback, Luna is dominating the fight against her opponent)
Old Master: FINISH HIM!
(Luna rips out the oversized heart of her huge opponent at a fighting 
tournament)
Announcer: (his announcement displayed onscreen as he says it) LUNA 
WINS...FATALITY!
%
(Flashback ends)
Luna: I mean I'm like, you kill one man, you kill a dozen. It's all the the 
same. I mean they can only hang ya once, right? (laughs) Am I right or am I 
right? (laughs) C'mon now, you're leaving me hanging!
(Huey, Riley and Granddad stare at Luna, obviously terrified)
Granddad, Huey and Riley: WE HAVE TO GO TO THE BATHROOM!
Granddad: (quietly) *Gasps* Move it! Move it! Move! Move! Hurry! Get on! Hurry 
Up!
(Luna looks suprised at their sudden departure)
(Huey, Riley, and Granddad retreat to the bathroom)
Riley: Thanks for inviting a killer kung-fu wolf bitch to the crib, Granddad!
Granddad: You think I knew she was a killer kung-fu wolf bitch!? She didn't say 
nothing about no damn Kumitie, Kumitoo, Kumite (kung-fu noise) Koom, black 
coon, now y'all just hush! And try to figure out what we gon' do. Huey, what we 
gon' do?
Huey: You gon' tell her to get the hell out!
Granddad: I'm not gonna tell her to leave! She might hit me with one of them 
exploding nutsack techniques!
Huey: Oh, come on, Grandad. She's not a kung fu master, she's crazy!
Grandad: Shit! Then you go kick her ass out!
Huey: But this is your respondiblity!
Grandad: Hey, I'm willing to say in the bathroom all night!
%
Uncle Ruckus: First of all, if woman is over 35 years old and she ain't married 
then she must be as nutty as squirrel shit!
Granddad: But everything was so right, and by everything else, I mean her 
looks. She was fine!
Uncle Ruckus: She couldn't look that good, she was black! But I guess if you 
put lipstick and a wig on a monkey, it could look good too!(chuckles, and says 
to himself) A monkey in lipstick and a wig...
%
(After telling Robert and Tom about the various abuse experiences she's had)
Luna: After that, I had one terrible relationship after another. I suffered 
every kind of abuse imaginable: Verbal...
%
Ex-Boyfriend #1: I told you not to wash my bloody ski mask with detergent 
because it irritates my fucking eczema!!!!
%
Luna: Spiritual...
%
Ex-Boyfriend #2: Look at ya, don't nobody want you but me. You ain't fuck 
without me. You without me equal shit, you understand that you ugly fat bitch. 
Now let me borrow your car.
%
Luna: ...and then there was that summer I dated Jim Brown...
%
Doorbell Ho: (orgasmically) Ding....... dong....
Thugnificent: That's right, nigga! Whore Bell.
%
Thugnificent: Shit, this one nigga came through here with his bitch - left with 
a case of hate poisoning, nigga. You know what I'm saying? Ay, Ay, Ay Flow, 
tell em about that nigga that got his spirits crushed by the rubies and and the 
diamonds and shit.
Flonominal: He killed himself, man. Took his own life and shit, Y'knamean? 
Suicide over some shit about his ex-girlfriend and all of that. We all knew the 
shit was about the diamonds and the rubies and the jacuzzi!
%
Thugnificent: Now Riley, I want you to know even though we're doing it real 
grand, if this rap shit don't work, we runnin' up in nigga's houses!
(The Lethal interjection crew all voice their approval)
Flonominal: We gonna be hittin' the street, son! Movin' mad rock all day, 
sellin' that real heavy drug shit!
(The crew shout their approval louder)
Lenny: Or we be flippin' those burgers at Wendy's, my nigga!
(The room falls silent)
Lenny: ...know what I mean? With the fries and shit, I do whatever nigga! 
Shakes, all that "extra ketchup? Here, you need some napkins?" You feel me?
(More silence. Everyone just glares at Lenny)
Macktastic: Man what the fuck is you talkin' about?
Thugnificent: What the fuck was that?
(Everyone else grumbles insults)
Lenny: I'm sorry man, I wasn't thinkin' about it. I shoulda said, like... 
Burger King...
(Thugnificent glares)
%
Thugnificent: What's good with you, planet earth? This your boy Thugnificent 
representing Terre-Belle, Georgia. You know I'm saying? Lethal Interjection 
living next to your home. Check the chain, nigga! (holds up chain) I know y'all 
love my music, and love my videos, and shit. But be fully prepared to drink 
hella haterade, nigga. Cause y'all 'bout to see how good it is to be me, and 
how bad it is to be you!
%
Riley: Hey, if nigga's ain't mad at you, you're doing something wrong!
Huey: By that definition then, you have a very bright future.
Riley: Thanks, man!
%
Riley: (narrating) Since I woke up, I knew who took my chain, Butch Magnus 
Milosovic.
Man: Butch Magnus?
Teen : Crazy Butch Magnus? Something is really wrong with that kid.
Old Woman: The most fucked-up child I've ever seen in my life. My long-ass, 
sorry, mothafuckin', goddamn life!
Woman: Butch Magnus? Awful, terrible human. Makes me sick just to think of him! 
I'm gonna vomit now.
Riley: (narrating) Otherwise known as 'One-Punch' Butch. He like to jack you 
first and ask you for your shit all after the fact.
Butch: (punches a kid and takes his sandwich) What kind of sandwich is this? 
(punches a kid and takes his iPod) What are you listening to? (punches a kid 
off his bike and rides off with it) Let me ride your bike real quick, bitch!
Riley: (narrating) Last year, Butch was expelled from the Jesus, Mary and 
Joseph Academy For Boys for assaulting a nun.
Butch: (takes the paddle) Gimme dis shit!
Nun: Ow! Ow! Ow! Ow!
Riley: (narrating) He even made it on one of those Maury Povich episodes where 
they send the kids to Boot Camp.
(Butch is sitting on stage casually, next to a security guard. An imposing 
drill instructor marches onto the set and starts yelling in Butch's face)
Drill Instructor: YOU LISTEN TO ME YOU LITTLE FAT ASS TURD, I AIN'T YO MOMMA 
AND I AIN'T GONNA PUT UP WITH THIS NONSEN--
(Butch smiles and headbutts the D.O. viciously, breaking his nose.)
Drill Instructor:' AAUUUGHHHH!! (collapses as blood gushes from his nose)
(The security guard tries to restrain Butch, only to be clobbered by a chair. 
Butch then smashes the chair on the terrified Drill Instructor.)
%
Thugnificent: Riley, why you didn't tell us someone jacked yo' chain?
Riley: I didn't want y'all to think I couldn't handle my shit like a man.
Flownominal: Riley, that's the whole point of bein' in a crew, nigga! So you 
ain't never gotta handle yo' own shit like a man!
%
Riley: HEY! "Bitch" Magnus!
Butch Magnus Milosevich: Whatchoo call me??
Riley: I call you a bitch, cuz you a bitch! What, you thought I wasn't gonna 
come see you? You thought you wasn't gonna get the taste smacked out of your 
mouth for trying to jack Young Reezy? You better fall back, nigga!
Butch Magnus Milosevich: You can't beat me! I'm Butch Magnus! AAARRRGGGHHH!
Riley: You do real good when you come outta nowhere and sucker punch a nigga. 
Why don't you fight a nigga straight up?
(Butch stalks up to Riley... the monstrous bully literally blocks out the 
sunlight as he towers above Riley. Riley stands his ground but looks just a 
little worried.)
%
Ed Wuncler III: [To a tied-up child hanging by his feet from the ceiling] Now, 
what I want you to do is think - just think - these two grapes, is your two 
little itty-bitty-kiddie testicles. [He smashes the grapes with a massive 
sledgehammer.]
Ed Wuncler III: WHERE IS THE CHAIN?
Boy: [crying] I don't know, I swear to God!
Ed Wuncler III: Don't swear to God. I talk to God all the time and God happens 
to be the one who told me to torture your ass, ya lyin' stealin' motherfucker. 
[raising the sledgehammer to take a swing at his face] You gonna tell me where 
that chain is, I know that!
Riley: Ed, can I talk to you outside? Please?
Ed Wuncler III: [Grabbing the boy's hair] Look at my face. Look at it! I'ma 
crush your little kiddie penis with this hammer when I get back, if you don't 
tell me where that chain is at!
Boy: [Wailing incoherently]
Riley: Now, Ed! [Riley and Ed leave the room] That's the wrong kid, Ed! I told 
you to grab Butch Magnus, 5'4, 130 pounds!
Ed Wuncler III: Well, how was I supposed to know that was the wrong kid?
Riley: I gave you a picture, man, how hard is it to grab the right kid, Ed?
Ed Wuncler III: [Walking back into the room] You told me to grab a kid. I 
grabbed a kid. You don't like the way I do it, then do your own kidnapping. 
[untying the boy] You know what, that's your only freebie. You want me to 
kidnap anyone else, you payin' top dollar.
Riley: That's not fair, you grabbed the wrong kid!
Ed Wuncler III: Tough titty! [To the boy] My bad. You go ahead and leave. [As 
he cowers] What the fuck you lookin' all scared for, huh? I said you was free 
to go right? Which part of 'my bad' do you not understand? Oh, so now you wanna 
make this a whole big fuckin' thing, huh? Well, fuck you, then! [he lunges at 
the boy, to be stopped by Riley]
Riley: Woah, okay, okay, enough, man, enough!
Ed Wuncler III: Naw, naw, man, I'm sick of this shit, I'm tryin' to squash it, 
right, and this bitch-ass motherfucker still actin' like he hurt and shit. 
[Grabbing at the boy with every sentence] I ain't even touched this 
motherfucker, yet! I ain't even brushed past you yet, I ain't even make eye 
contact with your punk-ass! [As the boy runs away screaming] Yeah, come on over 
here, I'll give your bitch-ass something to cry about!
%
Huey: Well, you were looking for hate. Way to go.
Riley: Shut up, punk! Instead of bein' Mr. Funny Nigga, why don't you try bein' 
Mr. Help-A-Nigga-Go-Jump-A-Nigga-And-Get-His-Chain-Back? Man, I gotta find a 
way to get it 'fore Thugnificent finds out.
Huey: Riley, let the chain go. If Thugnificent wants it back, he can handle it.
Riley: Then he'll think I'm a punk and kick me out the crew!
Huey: It's just rocks and metal. It's only worth what you're willin' to give up 
for it. Is it worth gettin' hurt again?
Riley: Yeah.
Huey: Goin' to jail?
Riley: Yeah.
Huey: Gettin' killed?
Riley: Yessir!
Huey: Kissin' a man?
Riley: Yeah-yeah! (A look of shock appears on Riley's face, and he covers his 
mouth.) Oh! NO!
Huey: WHOA! Kissin' a man? I mean, if it feels natural and that's what you're 
into, I mean... (Huey gets up and walks to the door without looking back.)
Riley: No, that don't count! That's a do-over! I didn't know you was gon' say 
dat!
Huey: Guess you really want that chain back. (Huey opens the door and walks 
out.)
Riley: NO! THE ANSWER IS NO!! (...and the door shuts.)
%
(Flonominal and Riley confront Butch at the baseball field)
Flownominal: Butch Magnus!
(Butch turns around with his usual defiant sneer)
Butch Magnus Milosevich: Eh?
Flownominal: Yeah, motherfucker! You fuck with ONE member of Lethal 
Interjection, you fuck'd with every last one of us! (starts forward -- Butch 
doesn't budge) Come try some of that tough (Beeped) with ME, you little--
(Butch slams a baseball bat into Flownominal's knee.)
Flownominal: Oh! Man!!! (collapses)
Riley: (winces)
Flownominal: (writhing on the ground) My motherfucking' leg! Owww!
Butch Magnus Milosevich: You can take this piece of shit chain! My dad had it 
appraised -- he said it was WORTHLESS! (throws the chain down next to 
Flownominal)
Flownominal: (in agony) Oh Jesus!!! My motherfucking! Oh Jesus!
Butch Magnus Milosevich: Ya broke bitch! Get a real chain! (casually walks off)
Flownominal: My leg is broken!! Aauuughhh.... (sobs) Mother(Beeped)'... stupid 
ass bitch! Motherfucker... oohhhh!
(Riley picks up the chain)
Riley: (narrating) Know what? Still better than an old funky "necklace"!
(Riley walks away proudly)
Flownominal: ...punk motherfucker! (notices Riley leaving) Man, Riley! We cool, 
nigga! Remember?!! Come help me, Riley! We in a crew! Augghh!! (Riley doesn't 
even look back)
%
(Annual All-Star Weekend presenter on Riley)
Presenter: Here he is winning the 3-point contest, making it rain like Lil' 
Wayne out this Mother(Beeped)! Without taking off his warm-ups! Or his Tims, 
nigga!
%
Presenter: Man, check out how Young Reezy shitted on these niggas in today's 
game! Here's Riley goin' up against Kobe Bryant, and breaks his ankle! Look at 
that bitch as nigga limpin' off the floor! Ooh, no wonder they ride his nuts so 
hard! Seems like Yao Ming wants some too! Get yo' bitch ass out the way, nigga!
%
Presenter: Shaq! Seventeen blocks from Riley, you had one. That's got to make 
you feel (Beeped) up!?
Shaq: It did at first, then I realized hating on Riley's superior game doesn't 
make my game any better, so I guess I have to work harder, step up to his 
level, that's what great players do, they bring the best out of everyone on the 
team.
Presenter: So he's better than you?
Shaq: Yes.
Presenter: And stacks more paper and get more hoes than you, nigga?
Shaq: Absolutely.
%
Uncle Ruckus: (blows referee whistle) Alright everbody, keep an eye on your 
wallet! Heh,heh heh! (to Riley) Look here ol' dawg, the only stealin' and 
shootin' I wanna see is this here b-ball, ya little future ex-con!
%
(Riley wants to change the name of the team from the Woodcrest Deers)
Tom Dubois: You don't like the name? We rep Timid Deer!
Riley: I don't wanna rep Timid Deer. I want to rep something that doesn't sound 
faggy!
%
(Uncle Ruckus is reffing the basketball game.)
Uncle Ruckus: (to Riley, regarding Cindy McPherson) Lookin' at the white girl 
is a foul. Speakin' to the white girl is a technical foul! And touchin' the 
white girl... ho-ho ho ho ho, now that's a LYNCHIN'!
%
"Fearsome" Cindy McPherson: Uh-Oh.Don't get picked by a girl now! I don't think 
you want that. That ain't pretty!
%
(Cindy is taunting Riley on the court as she stands dribbling)
"Fearsome" Cindy McPhearson: Got 'em.... Got 'em.... Got 'em!!
(Blows past Riley and scores with a layup)
Uncle Ruckus: FOUL, FOUL, keep your hands off that little girl
Riley: com on man that’s some old bullshit
%
(ruckus blows the whistle:) that’s a technical foul
Riley: 'Yo momma so ugly...' No, wait. We can say, 'yo momma so black, when she 
gets out of the car, the oil light comes on!'
(Huey looks at the opposing sideline, at Cindy's mother -- a very beautiful 
(and very white) woman)
Huey': I don't think that's going to work.
%
(After his team lose the last basketball game.)
Tom Dubois: Motherfuckker! Shit. Shit. Shit. Shit. Shit. Pricks! Shit. Shit. 
Shit. Shhhhhheeeeiiiiiittttt...
%
Riley Freeman: Yo momma got caught givin’ up neck in the bathroom at the 
Woodcrest Country Club and it wasn't yo daddy.
%
Uncle Ruckus: (talking to Riley) white man made you look like a fool, aint no 
surprise to me all the greatest basketball players have always been white still 
are Larry Bird, Dirk Novitzki oh sure he's ugly as hell on the face but he's as 
white as rice.
%
Riley: Huey?
Huey: Yeah?
Riley: I don't like losin'.
Huey: Well, then stop beatin yourself.
Riley: Huey?
Huey: Yeah?
Riley: You still a bitch! (laughs)
%
Robert "Granddad" Freeman: I've seen that raggedy piece of shit house. That 
nigga ain't lost that damn much.
%
Riley Freeman: Everybody knows that New Orleans Niggas is grime-y!"
Nique: (walks by) "Yup, thanks wotey"
Riley Freeman: "That's my hat!"
%
Jericho's Mother: The Lord will provide another lamp!!! Praaaaiiise 
JESSSSUSSS!!!!!
%
Uncle Ruckus: I hate jazz music, sounds like a&#65279; long car wreck with a 
bunch of cats!
%
Uncle Ruckus: Ever hear of that movie, When The Levees Broke? I got me a 
documentary called 'When Are The Levees Gonna Break Again?
%
Robert "Grandad" Freeman: I'm sorry the levees broke but if they don't get 
their black asses out of here, I'm gonna be broke.
%
Uncle Ruckus: I got a dog named Levee and every time it rains I kick him.
%
Jericho: Come on Robert, what would mama say it she knew you were kickin' out 
your family?
Robert "Granddad" Freeman: SHE'D SAY GET THEM BROKE-ASS NIGGAS THE FUCK OUT!!!
%
Jericho's mother (praying for Robert Freeman as a pipe organ plays in the 
background): I ask You to bless him, Lord, and keep providing for him, Lord, so 
that he may keep providing for us, Lord! JESUS!!!! Amen! As we walk in Your 
glory...
Robert "Grandad" Freeman: GET OFF OF ME WOMAN!!!
%
Riley: Bitch, this all you got?!! Three dollars and a prepaid cellphone with 
only two fucking minutes left on it?!!
%
Uncle Ruckus: Hey there Robert! I'd offer to help you with your bags, but you a 
coon!
%
Uncle Ruckus: Ain't nobody talking while I'm talking, so shut the fuck up! My 
name is Uncle Ruckus and I will be nigga-sitting you two until your grandfather 
returns. Your granddad had picked me cause I am a licensed zoologist. I have 
studied a variety of wild animals and the African male, if by far, is the most 
savagely cunning. This is an opportunity to observe you niggas in your natural 
habitat and collect data. But be warned, whatever nigga trickery you got up 
your sleeve does not affect me!
%
Huey: I'm not gonna fight you, I'm grounding you!
Riley: Ground me? What is this? Family Ties? Nigga, you can't ground me!
Huey: I just did. Don't leave the house.
%
(Riley is preparing to leave the house)
Riley: (under breath) This nigga musta lost it! I wanna know what this nigga be 
smokin' on! Shoot. Talkin' about I'm grounded. I'm Young Reezy! I goes where I 
wants'ta go.
%
(Huey begins to run at a rapid pace as Riley opens the door). (Huey kicks Riley 
in the face).
Huey: Your grounded!
Riley: (After being drop-kicked) You better have eyes in the back of yo' head, 
nigga!
%
Huey: I have supreme authority while Granddad's away!
Riley: You got supreme authority over these nuts, nigga!
%
Riley:(after being thrown in closet) I'm closet-phobic.
%
Huey: You ready to come out?
(Huey opens the closet door, but Riley is no longer inside. Riley appears in 
the hallway with a set of Air guns and starts shooting at Huey)
Riley: Say hello to the bad guy! Hee-hee! Heh heh heh heh!
Huey: Damn it Riley! You ruined our family! You drove granddad away, now he's 
never coming back!
Riley: Granddad left 'cause of you! Nobody likes you Huey, 'cause you're a 
gay-ass hater-fagey boy! Heh heh heh! Heh!
%
(A gun battle ensues)
%
Riley: Okay! I'm reloaded! Hee-hee! Heh heh heh heh! How you like that, fool?
%
(Both have guns pointed at each others heads, at point-blank range)
%
Huey: Why does it always have to end up like this?
Riley: Cuz youse a bitch.
Huey: Don't do it!
%
(They both pull their triggers and knock each other out)
%
Riley: Can't you just be happy to see another nigga fitted up--lookin' dipped 
and buttered and shinin' and glistenin'?
Huey:You used all of the money
%
Huey: You both say the word nigga all the time.
Robert"Granddad" Freeman: I do not!
Huey: Riley thought it was his name until he was three.
%
Ann Coulter: (repeated line) I mean... [scoffs]
%
Ann Coulter: I think it's criminal they suspended this teacher. I mean, just 
because he stood up to some foul mouth gang member.
Huey and Riley:GANG MEMBER??!
(Uncle Ruckus called Robert to ridicule him after Ann Coulter called Riley a 
"gang member")
Uncle Ruckus: Haw haw! That Ann Coulter really pulled your card, didn't she? 
Now that's one sharp, sexy white woman. She looks just like Helen of Troy. I 
don't care how big her adam's apple is, she's still all woman!
%
(On the phone trying to hire extras to fill out a protest)
Reverend Rollo Goodlove: Hell nah them niggas ain't getting no dinner, Just 
lunch...able
%
Interviewer: So Riley said the n-word before you did that morning?
Joe Petto:: He says it every morning! He calls me nigga, he calls the other 
kids nigga, he calls himself nigga. All the time. "Nigga this, nigga that." 
"Nigga, please." "Bitch nigga." "Nigga, have you lost your mind?" "Nigga, check 
that ho." "Nigga, you bullshittin'." "Break yourself, nigga!" He says it so 
much, I don't even notice it anymore. Last week in lunch, Riley says to a 
classmate, "Can a nigga borrow a french fry?" and my first thought wasn't "Oh 
my god, he said the word; the n-word." It was "Now how is a nigga gonna borrow 
a fry? Nigga, is you gonna give it back?"
%
Huey: The problem with restraining speech is, who gets to set the rules? If 
it's only okay in a certain time or place, who gets to say what time and what 
place? Bill Cosby?
Bill Cosby: B'yes! As a matter of fact I get to set the rules about what is 
appropriate to say and what is not appropriate to say! Forrrrr example: The 
other day a youth walked up to ME and asked "what it do?" He sounded like he 
was auditioning for a slave epic! Proper way to say that sentence is "What DOES 
it do?" I personally blame the MOTHER...
%
Bill Cosby: I don't think black people should ever use racist words when 
describing other black people. And if you DO, then you're a Sambo, and a Coon. 
B'HAH HAH HAH HAH.
%
Uncle Ruckus: (about Huey's story): What website is that?
%
www.madeupmonkeyshit.com ----
Slave: Hey Master, Deanda send a message for you.
Slave Master: I don't know of anyone named Deanda. Deanda who?
Slave: De End'a my (Beep), Nigga!
%
(Tobias has just been whipped by Colonel Lynchwater who has just left)
Tobias: You guys are real fucking' assholes, you know that?!?!
Slave 1: C'mon, man, look on the bright side. You get to hang out here in the 
fields. With the real niggas. Ain't you sick of the white man?
Tobias: You know what I'm sick of? You two blaming the white man for 
everything. The white man this. The white man that. You'll never get anywhere 
with that attitude.
Slave 2: Man, fuck that white nigga. That's your master. I don't know that 
nigga.
Tobias: All I'm sayin' is, you stop bein' a victim, you might be able to better 
your life on your own.
Slave 1: You ain't said nothin'. Ima do that. You better believe it. As soon as 
Catcher Freeman rides through here with his brigade and cuts that cracker's 
head clean off, unh, I'm outta here. You ain't never see no nigga be gone like 
Ima be gone. Tell you somethin'. You ain't seen no nigga ride out like me AND 
Ima join the gang. I got a letter sayin' I could join Catcher Freeman's brigade 
and ride out with that nigga.
Slave 2: Damn, you get mail, nigga?
%
(Tobias starts laughing)
Tobias: That's your plan?! Catcher Freeman, huh? Why don't I just wait for 
Santa Claus to take you away on his sled?
Slave 1: Nigga, you don't believe in Catcher Freeman?!
Tobias: (mimicks Slave 1) Of course I don't. I don't believe in the Easter 
Bunny either.
Slave 2: I'm tellin' you, man. Catcher Freeman is real. He go round from 
plantation to plantation freein' all the slaves and shit. He like 14 feet tall. 
Got trapezeous muscles and biceps. It's crazy. He ain't just no normal nigga, 
he Supernigga. He like a black-ass Batman if you will. And he can fly. 
Underwater.
Riley (V.O.): Wait, how'd they know who Batman is?
Granddad (V.O.): STOP INTERRUPTING!
Tobias: Ha! That's ridiculous! I don't even know who Batman is!
Slave 2: And what's your plan, house nigga? I bet you don't even wanna escape, 
all on Master's nuts.
Tobias: Oh I'm gonna escape all right. I'm gonna escape with this (points to 
his noggin), ok? With my mind. I've got this (pulls out a manuscript). It's a 
play but for the screen.
Slave 1: What screen, nigga? We in the 1800s.
Tobias: I've thought of a new way to display moving pictures on a screen. Of 
course, it's all abstract since I don't have any actual film or cameras or 
anything. But I'm gonna show Master Colonel my screenplay and when he reads it, 
he's gonna know this could be a huge projection.
Slave 2: Nigga, you tryin' to get off the plantation by sellin' a script? (They 
both start laughing) Nigga, you ain't even supposed to know how to read! How 
you gonna sell a script, asshole? Plus there's a writer's strike, nigga!
%
Field Slaves: Take our black asses outta here/ won't you take our black asses 
outta here/ won't you come save us, Catcher/ and kill all these crackers/ Lord 
take our black asses outta here
Lead Singer: Sing this muthafucker now!!!
Field Slaves: Take our black asses outta here
Lead Singer: Say, Massa Colonel youse a bitch nigga
Field Slaves: Won't you take our black asses outta here
Lead Singer: Gonna burn yo...
%
(song is cut off mid-sentence)
Master Colonel: Thank you, Tobias. I want you to know, you've always been like 
a son to me, except I would never ever lay with your black jungle bunny momma.
Tobias: Oh, master!
Thelma: KILLS DEM BOTH!
%
Tobias: NO! You lyin' black bitch! Thats wasn't a week! Oh!
%
Riley: Where y'all goin?! Y'all aint give me a chance to tell y'all my story! 
Y'all aint heard my Catcher Freeman story yet! My Catcher Freeman story better 
than all o' y'all! See my Catcher Freeman wurrn't no slave; he was like "fuck 
that shit, I'm a real nigga" y'know what sayin'! Plus he had 300 hoes and 
didn't just have no Thelma, he had all kinds of bitchez! And he rode a Bentley 
Coupe with twenty-fours and guns on the rims nigga what!
%
Robert:It's a bird, it's a plane, no it's Catcher Freeman! (Catcher jumps out a 
tree and proceeds to kill some white men) Get them, Catcher! Looks at him go. 
Look out, Catcher, behind you! (Catcher throws his sword into a white man's 
mouth, killing him) Oh, he got that cracker! Ha Ha!
%
(Story pauses)'
Riley:'Hold up, hold up! How this nigga learned that ninja shit? They didn't 
know about that back then!
%
(Catcher leaps from tree to tree like Tarzan)
Uncle Ruckus:Look at that nigga go! Ha Ha!
%
(Story pauses)
Riley:Oh look you see that nigga flip from tree to tree like on some old Tarzan 
shit? Wait, wait, wait, bring that back; I need that again!
Uncle Ruckus:I be happy to that for ya. (Scene rewinds and starts up again) 
Look at that negro go again! Ha Ha!
%
Host: Ok. Ok. Here it is. This yah boy! This yah boy look ok this moment you've 
all been waiting for. It's the world premier and that's not just around here 
that's the whole world. The brand new Gangstalicious video, the song is called 
Homies Over Hos.
Huey: (The host is still talking in the background about the video) I thought 
you hated Gangstalicious.
Riley: I mean he a punk and all that, but he send a nigga some free CDs and 
apologized and all so I decided to squash it.(music starts to play) He still a 
punk though.
Gangstalicious: Homies over hos (bitch). Homies over hos (bitch). Homies over 
hos (bitch). Homies over hos (bitch). Do the homie. Do the homie. Do the homie. 
Do the homie. You never catchin' 'Lish, rollin' with no bitch, 'cause bitches 
ain't (Beep). And so my crew is thick..
Riley: The beat is iight.
Gangstalicious: ... A bunch of knuckleheads. With bald heads and dreads. Nigga 
we hatin' on them hos like we hate the feds. Bitch can't you see fall back away 
from me. Me and my niggas bumpin' chests in the VIP. Now bump it to the left. 
Now bump it to the right. 'Cause when you do the Homie got to do it right.
%
Huey: Come on Riley. The song? The dance. I mean... "do the homie?"
Riley: The homie dance ain't gay. I do the homie.
Huey: That's not gay? You who thinks everything in the world is gay.
Riley: (flashbacks of riley) Nigga you gay. You gay. Ya'll niggas are gay. 
Nigga you gay. That's gay.
Huey: You don't find any of that gay at all?
Riley: Okay, so all that others stuff was gay. But Gangstalicious ain't gay. 
You cant just go throwin in that "gay" thing around Huey. Thats a serious 
accusation.
Huey; you the one who said he kissed a guy.
%
Uncle Ruckus: What in tarnation is he wearing?
Granddad: I don't know. Do you think he's...?
Uncle Ruckus: On the train to Faggotsville? Absolutely. No doubt in my mind. 
I'm so sorry, Robert. A gay grandson, huh? I can't imagine anything worse than 
that.
Granddad: Not Riley! Maybe there's another explanation. Maybe this is some kind 
of crazy sitcom misunderstanding.
Uncle Ruckus: No, wake up! Wake up and smell the gay coffee! All the evidence 
you could possibly need is right in front of your face. It'll only be a matter 
of time before that little boy be a grown man bent over a table with his pants 
'round his ankles being entered repeatedly by another man. Toot toot! Last 
train to Faggotsville leavin' in five minutes! Leavin' in five minutes for that 
chocolate tunnel hole!
%
A Pimp Named Slickback: So you see, my dearest Riley, it is this instinctive 
and burning need to procreate between a man and a bitch that not only keeps the 
human race going but also fuels many important industries such as my very own.
Riley: So what do you think about Homies Over Hoes?
A Pimp Named Slickback: Is that something at Denny's? I don't know what that is.
Riley: Homies Over Hoes? You know, like, you supposed to put your homie over a 
ho. That's how pimps do, right?
A Pimp Named Slickback: I don't think Homies Over Hoes is a sentiment that A 
Pimp Named Slickback can cosign, Riley. I mean don't get me wrong. A Pimp Named 
Slickback would put a lot of things over a ho. Money over a ho? Always. Brand 
new gators over a ho? Absolutely. A turkey sandwich with just tomato? 
Guaranteed. But homies? Oh no. A Pimp Named Slickback don't do shit for the 
homies. Let me reiterate. Don't do shit for the homies. Unless the homie wanna 
walk that stroll and get that money, a homie ain't gettin' a goddamn thing. And 
the same goes for brothers, peeps, dudes, fellas, dunnies, comrades, whatever 
the fuck niggas is callin' each other nowadays. Sound like some gay shit to me.
%
Huey: I like Elton John. But that doesn't make me gay.
Riley: Is Elton John gay?
Huey: Yeah.
Riley: See? And YOU gay.
%
Riley: (gesturing effeminately) I'm the most not-gay nigga of the not-gay 
niggas of the whole universe!
%
Riley: My nigga, I watch BET everyday, feel me? Ain't nuttin' wrong wit' me, 
feel me? Nigga you just hatin', feel me? That's why you ain't never gonna have 
no paper, ain't never gonna have no bitches, feel me?
%
(regarding Gangstalicious)
Riley He's gay. (pause) Isn't he?
Huey: Yep.
Riley: And I was his biggest fan. That makes me gay, don't it?
Huey: (pauses briefly, taking the cheap shot) ...Yep.
(Riley breaks down into tears)
Huey: (to himself, quietly) I know it's wrong. But I really want my own room.
(Huey walks to the door, and leaves just as Grandad walks in.)
Huey: Take it easy on him, Grandad. He's just -- tryin to come to terms with it.
(Grandad kneels down next to Riley to console him.)
Riley: (pitifully) Grandad... I think I might be....
Grandad: It's OK, son. I know.
Riley: ...I might be.... (breaks into sobs)
(Grandad hugs Riley as they both cry)
Grandad: It's OK, it's OK. Oh. You're a gay! Boy! How did that be, how did that 
happen....
%
Male BET Employee: I've got a question.
Weggie Rudlin: Of course you do, you didn't go to Harvard.
%
Uncle Ruckus : I wake up about a quarter of five in the A.M. every morning. 
That's about 12 more hours before most niggas wake up. Heh, heh.
%
Uncle Ruckus: Now one of the great pleasures of my day is taking these pretty 
little white children to school in the morning. Hey there, Mister Billy how ya 
doin?
Billy: (rudely past Uncle Ruckus and boarding the school bus) Move outta my 
way, fat boy!
Uncle Ruckus: I keep the bus nice and clean for them. These kids- oh excuse, 
'scuse me. (sees blonde little girl walking towards the school bus). Oh hello 
Miss Madison.
Madison: (rudely walking past Uncle Ruckus and boarding the school bus) 
Whatever.
Uncle Ruckus: There's my little sunshine. (spots Huey and Riley) Whoa, whoa 
hold it there! (waving hand-held metal detector around them) Where's the gun 
huh?
Riley: (indignant) Ay, man!
Uncle Ruckus: Where's the gun, huh? Go on, git, git! Get outta here! Go do your 
little hifey-fifey dances and nigga monkey shuffle somewhere else! This here 
bus is for kids with a future!
(Huey and Riley angrily walk to school together)
Uncle Ruckus: (drives the school bus up to Huey and Riley) That's right, that's 
right, get your lazy asses some exercise! Y'all should just grow up to be 
rappers, get into a beef and then shoot each other! Ah,ha,ha,ha!
(drives past Huey and Riley)
%
(While cleaning a urinal in the men's room in J. Edgar Hoover Elementary School)
Uncle Ruckus: People say there's no difference between the races. But I tell ya 
what that I've been cleaning bathrooms for a long time and I can say that white 
man (Beep) don't smell the same as black African (Beep). See, the white man 
just got a better liver,white man eats his meat raw. See that's healthier, he 
calls it tartar. (A white male gets out of a bathroom stall with his pants 
halfway down) Now how you doin' on this fine day sir? (White male becomes 
uneasy,stammers and his pants fall down, exposing his boxer shorts) May I say 
your dookie smells like sparkling ice water with a twist of lime. (White male 
exits men's room with his pants still halfway down). See? That's why he don't 
have to wash his hands neither! Yes sir, white man has impeccable hygiene.
%
(To Ruckus after finding out he is part-Scottish according to a DNA test)
Tom: I mean, why should Alex Haley be the only person to discover their roots, 
ya know? (laughs)
Uncle Ruckus: Uh, I'm sorry. Alex what?
Tom: Ya know, Alex Haley. Roots.
Uncle Ruckus: Roots? What is that some kinda gardening show?
Tom: You're joking, right? Roots, ya know Roots.
Uncle Ruckus: Eh, I don't follow ya.
Tom: Roots, Roots, Roots! You never heard of Roots, the mini-series? (to 
Jazmine) Come here honey. (picks up Jazmine) Hold on. Aaaaaah. (holds up 
Jazmine to the sky) Roots!
Uncle Ruckus: I dunno nothin' bout' whatchu talkin' about.
%
Mistress Leevil (to male BET employee):Uh, what network do you work for?
Male BET Employee: B.E.T.
Mistress Leevil: And what does that stand for?
Male BET Employee: Black Entertainment-(interrupted mid-sentence)
Mistress Leevil : NOOOOOOOOOOO!!! Black Evil Television. It's not enough that 
the shows are bad, they have to be evil as well. Send in my evil HENCHMEN! 
(camera cuts to a tall, large black man bald man dressed in black with a black 
female dressed in black with an afro and large gold hoop earrings) These are my 
evil henchmen, Big Nigga and Crazy Bitch. Big Nigga, Crazy Bitch, teach this 
person the meaning of black and evil. (Male BET employee and Weggie Rudlin 
collectively gasp in fear)
Crazy Bitch: Oh no dis nigga didn't!
Male BET Employee: No! Mistress Leevil, PLEASE! (Big Nigga marches up to him 
and grabs him by his afro) We're making more evil, I promise!! (Big nigga puts 
him in a chokehold)
Crazy Bitch: Oh HELL no, this mothafucker gonna pay! (takes off her earrings)
Male BET Employee: Weggie, PLEASE SAVE ME!! AAAAAAAAAAGH!!!
Crazy Bitch: YAAAAAAAA!!! (runs up to Male BET Employee and proceeds to slash 
him while Weggie looks in horror and then looks away as if he was unaffected 
amidst Mistress Leevil's maniacal laughter and the blood splattered on her and 
on the walls of the boardroom)
Mistress Leevil (after the boardroom quiets down): Weggie Rudlin!
Weggie Rudlin (nervously): Agh, aaaaagh! Huh?
Mistress Leevil: This Uncle Ruckus show, how's it going?
Weggie Rudlin (nervously): Huh uhhhhhhh (voice changes in pitch).. Great! 
F-fantastic!
Mistress Leevil: Is it evil?
Weggie Rudlin: Oh, absolutely.
Mistress Leevil: I hope so, Weggie for your sake. ( calmly wipes off blood 
splatter from her face). 'Cause if it's not evil then, you know what's gonna 
happen. By happening I mean killed or at least very seriously injured sooo, so, 
you know, just make sure it's evil.
%
Uncle Ruckus: I got somethin' for a fraternity for niggas. A fraternity of 
bananas up a tree! (barks like a dog, then laughs). Black fraternities should 
have a name, like boogedy boogedy! Hey, I got a black fraternity for ya, it's 
called prison! Jail Fi Jail, nigga!
%
(after finding out his DNA results came up as him being 102% African with a 2% 
marginal error)
Uncle Ruckus: (sighs) Well,I'm black now. So the first thing I did was quit all 
my jobs, I dunno how I'm supposed to pay all the bills. Probably have to start 
selling crack, or rappin' or rappin' 'bout selling crack. Ya know, I probably 
might not even have re-vitiligo.
(Knocks on The Freeman's door and Huey answers it)
Uncle Ruckus (sighs dejectedly): Okay, I'm black. What am I supposed to do now?
%
(while playing checkers with Robert at the park)
Uncle Ruckus: Oh, we probably gonna die any second now from one of these 
conditions and diseases niggas get. You name it, diabetes, gout, high blood 
pressure, asthma, sickle cell (Robert interrupts mid-sentence)...
Robert: Oh, Ruckus stop. This is all in your damn head,you the exact same fool 
you were last week. You were black then,you're black now and you're gonna be 
black tomorrow.(Ruckus sighs dejectedly) Ain't nothin' wrong with being black 
and if you give it a chance you might actually like it, Hmmm? Mmm hm?
(Cut to Robert and Uncle Ruckus at a Foot Locker)
Robert: Ruckus, what are we doing here?
Uncle Ruckus: Well, this is what niggas do,right? Buy sneakers, then maybe 
later we'll buy loud stereos and be-rate women in rap lyrics. (looks at a 
display hi-top sneaker with visible shock absorbers). Is this the shit you 
niggas wear nowadays? This look like a damn astronaut shoe! I'm black, I'm not 
walkin' to the moon! I'm walkin' to the liquor store!
Robert: Ruckus, STOP! C'mon man.
Uncle Ruckus: LeeBron James, Allen Iverson,can I get a shoe named after a white 
man, PLEASE?! (spots a young black male Foot Locker employee) 'Scuse me, darkie 
in the zebra shirt! Can I get a Bruce Jenner sneaker?
Robert: Man, to hell with this bullshit, you on your own! (walks out of the 
Foot Locker, leaving Ruckus behind).
Uncle Ruckus: I'm not leavin' here 'till I get me a shoe named after a white 
man! John Stockton, Pistol Pete Maravich, ANYBODY!
%
(cut to the Barbershop)
Barber (while cutting a male client's hair): Now I'm ain't sayin' I like the 
Democrats, but I don't and they sho' as hell don't know what the (Beep) they 
doin'. Now the Republicans, now they done (Beeped) the country up to hell!
Off-screen patron: Sho' did!
Barber: Nigga, look at Iraq! President over there, killin' black folks,wish 
they would send me to Iraq. I'd like to tell that motha(Beep)' Bush to kiss my 
black ass!
Uncle Ruckus: (angrily gets up from his chair) Now, that's enough, that's 
enough! Time out negroes, time out! I can't sit here and let y'all bad mouth my 
president. Did any of y'all niggas hear the president when he said Iraq was 
central to the global war on terror? Or did y'all miss it because he wasn't 
speakin' in baboon? Rababab rabbaba ba! Instead of sittin' here and choppin' 
off the brillo off each other's heads,y'all should take your black asses TO 
Iraq AND HELP FIGHT FOR OUR FREEDOM!(all the patrons and barbers are stunned 
and silent)A li'l more off the sides please. (gets kicked out of the barber 
shop) Damn go-rilla terrorists.
%
(in BET Torture Lab/Chamber)
White Scientist (laying strapped to gurney wearing only his boxer shorts): Just 
what is going on?!! WHY have you kidnapped me?!
Weggie Rudlin: And now, doctor we will now discuss your methods of DNA testing. 
(laughs evilly)
White Scientist: No,PLEASE! NOOO!
(Weggie presses button to turn on ray machine, but after machine starts up, the 
whole room goes into a power outage).
Weggie Rudlin:(Beep)! Why does this always happen when we try to use the 
GODDAMN TORTURE MACHINE?!!Can somebody PLEASE get the power back on so we use 
the torture machine?!!
Male BET Employee (off-screen) : I think somebody forgot to pay the bill, 
Weggie.
Weggie Rudlin: WILL SOMEONE PAY THE (Beeping) BILL?!!
%
(in the movie theater while Madea's Next Movie is playing)
Uncle Ruckus: Will you niggas, PLEASE shut the hell up?!! I'm tryin to watch 
this piece of (Beep) movie?!!
%
(Talking to Weggie Rudlin after his failed attempt at committing suicide)
Uncle Ruckus: Oh,what's the point? What's the point in living if there's 
nothin' to look forward to? but just of life full of rap music and fo'ty 
ounces? What am I supposed to do now, huh? Be somebody baby daddy? Hang out on 
the corner all day and night, shootin' dice, cops chasin' me all the time? My 
body ain't made to handle a stun gun, ain't got but two or three shows I could 
identify with.
Weggie Rudlin: Ruckus, you make a very compelling argument, but I know that 
you're gonna get through this.
Uncle Ruckus: Huh, is this what I'm supposed to be readin' now? This? The Vibe, 
The Source, JET? You call this a magazine? Look at this! This is a pamphlet! 
Field and Screen, National Review, Soldier of Fortune THOSE are magazines! This 
is a brochure! Ebony, they should call this National Geographic but the photos 
are better, and Essence?!! Essence of what? Essence of ugliness!
Weggie Rudlin: Ruckus, we have a saying in B.E.T., we hate black people and I 
know you share that same sentiment. But I've learned how I could use my 
blackness against the black race. Look at B.E.T, you think we'd put this shit 
on the air because it's entertaining? You think we sit down and say "hey, let's 
be entertaining? how about a Baldwin Hills reality show?". I have good taste, 
Gregory Hines is entertaining, Sammy Davis Jr. he's entertaining. You think I 
can relate to anything these young niggas have to say? No! We air this shit 
because we despise our audience! Are there other ways to make money? Yes, of 
course. Yes, yes. But they all require more work, this is easy. The only people 
who suffer, the only people who suffer, Ruckus are black children. I think we 
both could live with that.
Uncle Ruckus: Weggie Rudlin, you sho' do have profound insights. but I don't 
know, I just don't think I could stand life as a darkie.
%
Sgt. Gudda: (his response to Thugnificent's opinion of him on the radio) Hey, 
dawg. First off, I wanna say that I'm a huge fan of Thugnificent, I grew up 
listinin' to Thugnificent. Matter of fact, I'd even go ahead, as far, to say 
that I love this nigga, no homo. He's one of the real niggas that made me wanna 
do this shit. (A second of silence; Thugnificent is pretty amazed to hear what 
Sgt. Guddda said about him so far.) But f**k this old ass nigga, man! (He 
laughs; Thugnificent's amazement gives way to a "WTF" expression.) This old 
nigga is old enough to be my dad, and he tellin' me to eat a dick? Nigga, 
what's wrong wit' you?! You a grown-ass man and you tellin' a fifteen-year-old 
to eat a dick? I know yo' mother raised you better than that, dawg. Matter of 
fact- (he dials on the phone) Excuse me, is this Mrs. Jenkins?
"Mrs. Jenkins": (over phone) Yes it is.
Sgt. Gudda: My name is Sgt. Gudda. (Thugnificent is now shocked.) I dunno if 
you aware, but yo' son said some very rude things about me on the radio.
"Mrs. Jenkins": (over phone) Yes, I know. He said some very rude things and 
he's too old to be actin' like dat, and I don't like him usin' that language, 
either. You know, one time I--
Sgt. Gudda: (pressing the hold button on the phone) That was yo' mamma, nigga, 
yo' mamma. (Thugnificent is now furious over this.) Grow yo' old ass up, nigga! 
I hope you go broke, you fill me? I hope that IRS is on their way over right 
now to take yo' shit, nigga.
%
Ed Wuncler Sr. surveys the new kickball team Huey assembled for the 
tournament(the team consists of Tom, Granddad, Mrs.Van Housen, Ed Wuncler III, 
Riley, Cindy MacPhearson, Butch Milosevic and an Asian adult male with a face 
painting of the Tibetan flag[Jingmei]).
Ed Wuncler Sr.: Who the fuck are you?!
Jingmei: I am Jingmei! I come from Tibet! I wanted to beat the Chinese 
oppressors in kickball!
Ed Wuncler Sr.: Why?
Jingmei: I hate fucking Chinese!
%
In Granddad's dream, dozens of Stinkmeaners try to break into his house. Three 
Stinkmeaners emerge from a wall, and one yells:
Colonel Stinkmeaner: My name is Colonel H. MOTHERFUCKING Stinkmeaner, and this 
time, I'm rolling DEEP, NYU-KA!!
%
[Rufus Crabmiser launches the Flying Guillotine at Bushido Brown, which misses 
by several feet and embeds in a tree branch. Bushido Brown, assuming the weapon 
is stuck, proceeds to charge Crabmiser, who retracts the Guillotine -- which 
cleanly beheads Bushido Brown from behind. Bushido Brown's head sails through 
the sky in slow motion as a fountain of blood gushes from his neck.]
George Pistofferson: DY-NO-MIIIIITE!!!
Colonel Stinkmeaner (narrating): It's a beautiful day to FUCK SHIT UP! (laughs 
maniacally)
Bushido Brown's head plops down on the walkway and rolls to the front steps of 
the Freeman Residence
Granddad, Huey, Riley and Brown's Advisors: (in unison) Oh, SHIT!
%
[As the police arrest the other three Hateocracy members]
Colonel Stinkmeaner (narrating): And that's the moral of the story. Some niggas 
need to go jail! I may be in hell, but at least I ain't in jail, nigga! (laughs 
maniacally)
%
[In Granddad's dream, Tom lets the Stinkmeaners drag Sarah away.]
Sarah: TOM, YOU PUNK-ASS MOTHERF-- AAAH!
%
[In response to one of Bushido Brown's demands]
Granddad: Nigga, did you just tell me to wipe your ass?
%
[Referring to Bushido's corpse]
Granddad: Somebody get that headless dickhead off my lawn!
%
Riley: I don't give to nobody, I just pay the cost to do business.
%
Riley: (Narrating) People call me The Fundraiser... They call me that 'cause 
tha's what I do... I raise funds... I get my money up. The first rule of 
fund-raising is, don't give nothin' to nobody, period. No charities, no 
homeless people, Salvation Army, Red Cross, starving Africans, notin'. You 
can't be raising funds and givin' funds away at the same time. Tha's like 
gettin' high on your own supply. I always had the drive to make money, and the 
plan. I knew that if I studied enough gangsta' movies, I'd know everything I 
need to know to take over the street.
%
Granddad: (To Riley about the messy living room) Jesus! boy look at you, All 
you do is lay around here and watch TV and eat my food and breath my air, just 
as lazy as you can be, go out and do something.
Riley: What am i supposed to do? I aint got no money!
Granddad: Well try getting up off your ass and cleaning up my living room, You 
lucky President Obama is not here to see this! You're lazy, you need a hobby or 
something'!
Riley: Give me an allowance and I'll find a good hobby.
Granddad:Allowance?! I allow you to live here. I allow you to eat my food! I 
allow you to run up my electricity!
Riley: I mean a money allowance.
Granddad: Well how about this? Trash is starting to stink, and guess what? 
You're allowed to take it out. He he he.
Riley: I was a loser, I might as well been dead..
%
Jazmine: Hi Mr. Freeman!
Granddad: Well hello little baby.
Jazmine: Would you like to buy some candy bars to keep kids away from gang and 
guns?
%
Riley: You wanna be in this business, you got to pay the cost to doing 
business, and when the cost gets too high, you get out of business.
%
Riley: Look. F**k you. F**k the plane you flew in on. F**k them shoes. F**k 
those socks with the belt on it. F**k your gay ass fairy faggot accent. F**k 
them cheap ass cigars. F**k your yuckmouth teeth. F**k your hairpiece. F**k 
your chocolate. F**k Guy Ritchie. F**k Prince William. F**k the Queen. This is 
America. My president is black and my Lambo is blue, nigga. Now get the f**k 
out my hotel room, and if I see you on the street, I'm slapping the shit out of 
you.
%
Robert: I gon' really let him have it. Show him my stuff. Give that man 
everything I got.
Riley: Pause.
Robert: Pause? Pause what?
Riley: You said somethin' gay, so you gotta say "no homo" or else you a homo.
Robert: But what did I say gay?
Riley: You said you was gon' give this dude everything you got. No homo.
Robert: That's not gay. I said I was gon' give the man everything I got.
Riley: Pause, Granddad. If it sound gay, its gay and you gotta say "no homo". 
How I know you not a homo, Granddad, if you don't say "no homo"?
Robert: I'm not sayin' "no homo".
Riley: Okay, you wanna be a homo.
Robert: Stop callin' your granddaddy a homo!
Riley: Then say "no homo"!
Robert: I don't wanna say "no homo"! Imma homo yo' ass, if you don't stop 
sayin' pause!
Riley: . . . . Pause.
%
Huey: But, beneath his support of the gay community was a dark secret. Tom had 
a fear of going to jail, and being anally raped.
[Tom is in a locker room, but he suddenly grows suspicious. As he looks at the 
other men in the locker room he imagines that one of them is trying to rape him]
Imaginary Man: Hey hey hey nigga. You got a nice little ass nigga. Gimme yo ass 
nigga! Nigga you see me lookin' atchu nigga gimme yo ass, nigga.
Tom: No! Stay away!
[Tom runs away as another man tries to talk to him]
Man: Hey, Brown Skin! Brown Skin! Let me holla atcha.
[The other men in the locker room look at each other, confused]
%
The Booty Warrior: When y'all go to prison, the most important thing in your 
life is gonna be booty. A man's butt.
Inmate: [From offscreen] Y'all better listen to him.
The Booty Warrior: Booty- gettin' some booty- is more important than food. It's 
more important than drinkin' water. If I see a man I like, I tell it like this 
here. [Looks straight at Tom, the camera zooming in on him as eerie music 
plays] I likes ya.
Inmate: He likes ya!
The Booty Warrior: And I wants ya.
Inmate: And he wants ya!
The Booty Warrior: Now we can do this the easy way, or we can do it the hard 
way. The choice is yours.
Inmate: WHATCHU WANT, TOM?!
The Booty Warrior: So what's it gonna be? I asked you a question, Tom.
Inmate: I CAN'T HEAR YOU, TOM!
[Tom is shaking and sweating by now, visibly nervous]
Tom: I don't answer...
The Booty Warrior: Ah-ah-ah! What was that? I can't hear you, Tom!
Tom: I said I don't wanna answer- I don't wanna- I don't wanna do this anymore!
The Booty Warrior: Sounds to me like you want it the hard way!
Inmate: GIVE IT TO 'IM!
%
[The Booty Warrior and a group of inmates have started an uprising and are 
attempting to escape the prison, but quickly become lost.]
Inmate 1: Well, what do we do now?
Inmate 2: Ask him, it was his idea! I thought you had an escape plan worked out 
or somethin'!
The Booty Warrior: An escape plan? Uh... booty, is more important, than 
escapin'. So, I said to myself when I seen that shank, "This is an opportunity 
for me to get some booty".
Inmate 3: That was it? Nigga, I thought you had a demand!
The Booty Warrior: Oh, I had demands! I had demands to get some booty!
Inmate 3: I thought this was supposed to be some Attica type shit!
The Booty Warrior: Now, how y'all think that make me feel?! Y'all let the booty 
get away! Now I gotta go hunt down the booty! Damn!
%
[Tom has escaped from the rioting inmates and is also lost inside the prison; 
he finds a phone and attempts to call for help.]
Operator: Sir, where did you say you were again?
Tom: I'm inside the prison! How long 'till the cops come in and save us?
Operator: Well, I wouldn't hold your breath. [To someone in the 911 office] 
Yeah, I got a guy on the phone here that says he's inside Horton Prison. [To 
Tom] Sir, have they raped you yet?
Tom: Wha-no! What kind of fucked up question is that?!
[The 911 operator cracks up laughing]
%
(Uncle Ruckus talks about how his adopted father always used to abuse him)
Uncle: (voice over) I had two younger brothers: my brother Darryl, and my other 
brother Darell, but Mister always seemed to single me out the worst. (young 
Darryl and Darell bump on the table, knocking over a vase and breaking it 
accidentally) I would get beaten fo' anything.
(Mister comes into the house and notices the broken vase, blaming young Uncle)
Mister: (furious) Nigga, did you just break that vase?!
(Mister slaps Uncle violently all the way to the floor. Bunny rushes in and 
cradles her son.)
Bunny: Oh, sweet Jesus, Lord have mercy, my baby!
(Wipe fade to show young Uncle holding a teddy bear and admiring it)
Uncle: (voice over) Just havin' fun was off limits in Mister's house.
(Mister comes in, noticing Uncle holding the teddy bear)
Mister: (furious) Nigga, did I just catch you havin' fun?!
(Mister slaps Uncle violently all the way to the floor. Bunny rushes in and 
cradles her son.)
Bunny: Oh, sweet Jesus, Lord have mercy, my baby!
(Wipe fade to show young Uncle reading a book about doctors)
Uncle: (voice over) Every day, he reminded me of what a failure I was going to 
be.
Young Uncle: (noticing his father come in) Mister, I wanna be a doctor when I 
grow up.
Mister: (furious) Nigga, did I just catch you wantin' to be shit?!
(Mister slaps Uncle violently all the way to the floor. Bunny rushes in and 
cradles her son.)
Bunny: Oh, sweet Jesus, Lord have mercy, my baby!
%
(Nelly Ruckus remarks about Mister's family, and says that she's dying)
Nelly: Ugh, look at you. Didn't I tell you, you wasn't gonna be shit with yo' 
stupid ugly wife and yo' stupid ugly chirrens? I can't wait to die so I don't 
have to look at yo' ugly, black nigga ass anymo'. Goddamnit!
(Mister has just about had it with Nelly's remark)
Mister: Aaaaaaaaaaauuuuggh! I can't take it, no mo'!
%
(In the final minutes of the episode, an angry Jack Flowers takes Ed Wuncler, 
III.)
Ed, III: HEEEEEEEELLLLP!! Somebody, shoot this muthafucka! (as Jack Flowers 
takes him away) You can't do this to me! Do you know who I am? GRANDADDY!!
Ed Wuncler, Sr.: (responding with a smile) What are you waiting for? Shoot him!
%